
The Warrior Within All Lectures Transcript
Lecturer	Dr Robert Moore
Year	
The Warrior Within 02.mp3	[00:00:01.130] 
Well, I'd like to welcome you to this beginning of your sessions on behalf of the Institute and the Chicago metropolitan area's Jungian community which is a growing group of people dedicated to the study of Jung's psychology in relationship to contemporary life. I know many of you past get a chance to meet let me say just a little bit more about myself and what brings me here for this.

[00:00:43.310] 
I am an analyst in private practice Chicago and work a lot with men, with women who are trying to figure them out.

[00:00:57.570] 
And I go around lecturing on masculine psychology around the country and working on a lot of work on masculine Psychology today and feel that there are very few things that are more important than studying masculine psychology given the situation in our world today.

[00:01:22.410] 
And these four sessions are an elaboration of some introductory work that I've been doing on four major architects of masculine which I'll just do a quick overview tonight for those of you that have not been working with that. I'll also try to say a little bit about how they relate to female psychology. But tonight first half at least, I want to spend getting us an orientation to thinking about archetypal psychology, why I think about it at all and the uniqueness of Jung's work in this area and the sessions as I've seen the program as I envision them. Tonight we'll look at the archetype itself as its manifest in cultural materials. And next week we'll talk about we'll emphasize the potential that archetype for masculine psychology today, what it is.

[00:02:33.040] 
We emphasize more what it is for in terms of actualizing some sense of the warrior in appropriate way.

[00:02:44.630] 
I want to do that first before emphasizing the pathology because I'm really tired of people not understanding that the warrior is an important aspect of human psyche. I'm not one of those that thinks it can ever be expunged. It will never be expunged. The only thing that can be done is to deal with it realistically. It's like all the other archetypes you'll see in a minute.

[00:03:13.630] 
You get a fantasy abandonment only to your peril and the peril of people around you.

[00:03:24.350] 
I want to emphasize the potential next week and talk about how it operates optimally.

[00:03:45.030] 
And then I want to spend a good deal of time about the way in which this archetype operates in psychopathology. And I will try to present a number of different forms in which this operates, does not operate correctly when it's not balanced in the psyche of a person, how it manifests itself. And then the fourth session I want to talk about concrete ways that you can heal the warrior when you're selling other people.

[00:04:22.770] 
Some of you may be involved in management, some of you may be therapist within yourself. You focus a lot on therapy, therapy techniques.

[00:04:40.730] 
I might have started today of all days.

[00:04:46.810] 
I might have appropriately started psychopathology given the fact that in Stockton, California yesterday the Warrior Archetype possessed a fellow and.

[00:05:00.170] 
And he became a mighty boy warrior and he got his AK 47 and he went into a schoolyard and he proceeded bravely and mightily the mighty warrior, one mighty boy warrior to kill a lot of his children. And the history of the and race with regard to this archetype has been largely a history of boy warriors.

[00:05:34.010] 
As we will see so often. The masculine archetype of potentials that related here are honored in their accessing, being accessed as shadow aspects of psyche.

[00:05:55.810] 
It's very difficult to be a man, much more difficult than most people realize. And certainly in our particular time it's not receiving very much thought. The whole idea of manhood or becoming a man or becoming a mature man, what that's about does not receive a great deal of thought. Certainly when you compare reflection on what it takes to become a man as compared with what it takes to become a woman today. The female of our species has done a lot better job of late doing some homework with regard to feminine potentials.

[00:06:45.730] 
And while there's a lot of work to be done still yet on the archetypal feminine and ways of balancing that in a mature woman's life, while there's a lot to be done, they're so far ahead of us in terms of work on the masculine that it's a pretty rough situation.

[00:07:11.130] 
It's particularly difficult I think today for women because increasingly women are intuiting that there's not a lot they can do for their men to help them do this and yet they want to be helpful. And it's very frustrating to be trying to help a man when you don't know what to do to help him. So this is why a lot of people are trying to let me get into the basics of archetypal psychology as I'm using it here briefly to give you a sense of the way that I'm doing this. I want to differentiate myself from the school represented by James Hillman, so called archetype of psychology.

[00:08:12.990] 
Hillman, I don't know how many of you studied much of that. Hillman in many ways does not stay with June's original understanding of the role of the archetype, the archetype and the role of the archetype in the psyche. I consider myself much more orthodox union in terms of my understanding of the archetype and the way it functions.

[00:08:38.550] 
I really believe there are archetypes. I don't think they're merely fantasy products of imagination. And I really believe that to go the route that James Hillman and some of the other people in so called archetypal psychology have done is to do away with humans major contribution to human psychology because it really matters whether or not you believe that the human psyche has a deeply structured form in the unconscious.

[00:09:14.050] 
The thing that differentiates union from a Freudian today, interestingly it didn't differentiate Freudian the same way, but contemporary unions and contemporary fraudians differ on this. The fraudians don't really believe that the unconscious is really that structure. They see it as sort of a soup loaded with energy, full of primitive infantile affects, feelings, emotions and so forth. They're not really that structured. Unions who really adhere more essentially to God's teaching on site really believe that it's more like a student down in that pot.

[00:10:12.390] 
And they are shaped in certain ways. They're not all shaped the same way. And these objects down in the unconscious have an effect on the ego when they come in proximity to the ego or the conscious mind. And they don't all have the same effect.

[00:10:37.850] 
If you study contemporary brilliant psychoanalysis and some of his derivatives, you would have the idea, for example, that infantile pathological grandiosity, wherever it manifests, is always the same.

[00:10:58.450] 
If you follow Jung, you know that that's wrong, incompile pathological grandiosity manifests itself in radically different ways. It's all grandiosity. But to put it this way, if you are possessed by the archetype of the king, you will be infantilely grandiose in a certain way and the people around you will be affected in a certain way. There will be certain behaviors you will engage in and certain behaviors you will avoid. But if you're possessed by the archetypal lover, you will still be pathologically infantile grandiose, but you won't act in the same way that the man who is possessed by the king will act.

[00:11:53.330] 
And the same thing is true about the old form. That is to say, while we appreciate person like Heinz Koba and other contemporary psychoadian psychoanalytic tradition, those of us who consider ourselves youngians believe the young psychology of grandiosity is in many ways far superior to that of drug. And I think that is one of the that is the most unique thing, I think, about healing psychology. And it's what makes it radically superior to other forms of depth psychology, because it gives you much more of a geography of the unconscious, much more of a sense of the shaping of those deep structures in the unconscious that influence your behavior. Gives you much more a sense of the grammar and the recognizability of these structures so that you can figure out what is happening with yourself or with someone else when they are being possessed by a certain form or whether they are projecting it on someone else around them.

[00:13:16.750] 
So rather than just seeing the archetypes as interesting things that you can study, they have enormous significance for human behavior and personality. And not to know about them and not to know the way they influence society is really a dangerous thing because you're meeting these things all the time. So let me just start off by saying that you don't talk about the objective psyche, the objective psyche. And by that he meant a structured aspect of the collective unconscious of the human race that is not in the ego, that influences the ego and which can be studied by studying human culture, religion, folklore, mythology. And so forth and you can get a sense of the phenomenology of these structures inside the way that they appear in human experience.

[00:14:41.370] 
But knowing the archetypes is just one task. What you have to have a sense for is the way in which they function. How do they function? They function as energy sources in society. They function as shapers of behavior, feeling, thinking.

[00:15:11.890] 
They shape the image one has of the future of the past.

[00:15:20.390] 
They shape one's love or one's inability to love.

[00:15:28.490] 
They have an interesting quality that you need to get very clear about, and that is they tend to be very imperialistic each time. Each one wants all of you.

[00:15:45.230] 
All of you. I Want All of you is the theme song of every archetype. So one of the things that you do when you're looking at yourself in this kind of point you is you ask yourself which archetypal forms are dominating you, which ones tend to be dominant in your personality? You will notice if you look closely at any person, unless you're, of course, one of these individuals tend to be dominated by one or two archetypes and they tend to be very out of touch with the others. Yes.

[00:16:28.350] 
Do you see in your analysis sometimes a real struggle between one two competing archetype? All the time.

[00:16:40.290] 
All the time.

[00:16:43.730] 
Gene Boland, in the book that you all ought to read in order to kind of practice your thinking this way, that Goddesses in Every Woman book has analyzed the feminine psyche using various goddesses as ways to think about these structures. She's coming out in the spring with a book, Gods and Every Man, which will be, I think, useful. And she's going to be here Friday night speaking on Dionysis. While I personally don't think that looking at gods and goddesses is the best way to get at this, it's certainly useful, and I recommend her work strongly on this. But one of the things she emphasizes quite rightly is that these goddesses all want to talk at the same time.

[00:17:39.730] 
And for example, if you look at the contemporary career woman, the Athena personality is very sturdy. It certainly is assertive. She's going to be successful because if the Athena is the female warrior image and if a woman does not have a lot of Athena, she will be at a great disadvantage in the world career. But if Athena has too much power over her, she will not be able to sustain an intimate relationship with a man very long.

[00:18:30.130] 
It will be very limiting in the kind of relationship she can have with a man. One of the things that I will want us to get clear about is what this archetype of warrior does in relationships, what it excludes, what it can include, what potentials it has for forming relationship, avoiding relationship, and also what what it does to help you stay in a relationship once you've got one. It's an interesting paradox that if you don't have a lot of the qualities of the warrior. See, if you do have a lot of the warrior it's going to be hard to form a lasting relationship. But if you don't have a good bit of the warrior and the qualities of the warrior you won't be able to keep going.

[00:19:20.610] 
It's a very interesting thing and it's interesting that if you have a whole lot of the archetypal lover you'll form lots of relationships but keeping them will be a different thing because the qualities, the good points of the lover are not those the archetype of lover is promising.

[00:19:57.470] 
So in any case, let me just say a few more things about the way the archetype is and the way it operates. The unions say it's numinous, N-U-M-I-N-O-U-S. Luminous comes from the term used by the great phenomenology Rudolph Auto and it means sort of magical, sparkling with magical energy and power and attractiveness and seductiveness. All archetypal patterns have a certain magical quality to them. They tend in their own power to organize things around them like a magnetic field.

[00:20:42.430] 
And to the extent that your ego is not very strong or as a self psychologist would say, to the extent that you don't have a consolidated little s theft structure, you will be pushed and pulled willy nilly by archetypal patterns and you will be very much at their mercy. If you have a developed ego, as ego psychologists would say, you will be able to be a little bit less vulnerable to the bullying of archetypal patterns. In other words, you will be able to choose and relate to them much more consciously and with much more freedom. The union word individuation, what's that got to do with archetypes? Well, you have to individuate against the pool of archetypes.

[00:21:46.050] 
In other words when you're a real innocent, how you're a real archetypal. This is what a lot of people don't understand. Being archetypal doesn't make something good. In fact with human beings the more archetypal they are, the crazier they are. Do you understand that?

[00:22:06.230] 
There's nobody more archetypal than a psychotic paranoid schizophrenics are walking archetypes. Borderline personalities are in touch with the archetypes a lot more than you.

[00:22:23.870] 
And if you are a Borderline, one of the neat things about you is precisely that.

[00:22:34.210] 
Seriously borderlines are a lot more in touch with this stuff than their audience. That's why the lot is exciting to be Borderline.

[00:22:47.970] 
Never. They're all over. Sometimes you wish it was more dull but that's not the problem with the Borderline excitement and it's precisely because the Borderline doesn't have much in the way of ego structures and therefore there's not much to repression barrier between them and the archetypal world. So they're kind of magical people and the thing they have to do is learn how to appreciate that. And Borderline has to realize that if they get a little stronger in terms of their ego and self structure.

[00:23:25.820] 
That doesn't mean they have to be ordinary.

[00:23:32.630] 
The problem about psychotherapy, if you go to a psychotherapist at another school is that the goal of most therapists is to make you ordinary.

[00:23:45.030] 
And most therapists think that if you don't think you're ordinary, then you're crazy.

[00:23:51.770] 
Fact is that from a union point of view, it's absolutely unnecessary to make somebody ordinary in order to cure. In fact, from a union point of view, if you think you're ordinary, you simply haven't finished working on your ego self axis because it is your connection to the archetypal self within you that lets you flow with this magic.

[00:24:20.770] 
But the crazier you are, the more you'll think you're the archetypal self and you won't be aware of the danger relating to this thing. So your circuits will always be overheated or your circuits right to be gone.

[00:24:40.650] 
So the union point of view is a very good news for anybody with an artistic bent because if you're an artistic type, the last thing you're going you must rather be crazy than uncreate any day.

[00:25:05.330] 
Well, we'll get in that in a minute. Each one of them has some piece in it. And don't let me forget to go into that a little bit because each each one of these successful artists, somebody that's really centered as an artist will participate in some useful way. But the important thing to realize is that this is this when you say archetypal energy, you're talking about something that is like 220,000 volts. We're talking about something that you're not meant to mainline.

[00:25:47.150] 
You're not supposed to have your finger in the side. And it's very important when you understand this archetype, the yogi and psychology of archetypes, to understand that an archetype is not something you want to be it's not something you want to be real close to because it is a very magical, powerful pattern and energy source in the psyche. It's there for a particular purpose. If you utilize it in a mature way, it will really fuel you and inspire you and you will not be bored. But it won't make you psychotic if you get into it inadvertently, it will make you crazy.

[00:26:41.390] 
If you have had enough development of your ego defenses and your family so that you're almost neurotic you're up to the level of almost being neurotic, what will happen when you get really close to the archive energy is all your circuits will go, your defenses will operate and shut it down. It's like an automatic failsafe system on nuclear reactor. Get that? Think about it. If you are not really borderline, if you're a little more organized in your personality than a borderline, when you get close to this stuff, when you get too close to it, you'll shut down and get depressed.

[00:27:22.590] 
So if you have a chronic depression think about it, if you have a chronic depression, it means that your defenses are helping you stay away from the archetypal inputs.

[00:27:41.650] 
Is that good or bad? Well, it depends. It's good if you don't want to be psychotic. I always treat somebody's depression as friendly because I see it as compensating grandiosity.

[00:27:59.670] 
If you're a clinical psychology trained into everybody else school of thought, they will teach you that manic states compensate for depression, that a person is getting near to being depressed and so they're having to be in a manic state to defend against the depression. That's exactly the opposite of what's true.

[00:28:27.970] 
In other words, the person that's depressed is an individual whose defenses are working well enough that when they are too close to this archetypal energy, the defenses operate like a fail safe system and shut the systems down just like in a power plant. And there would be repression. That's repression. To the extent that your defenses are fairly matured, not great, but good enough, you will get depressed and not crazy. Get it?

[00:29:05.310] 
If you are not as well organized, you will start getting crazy. And how will that look? You will get compulsive in some form or you will get manicured and you'll start not being able to sleep. And you'll be super creative. And then you'll have to go see your dealer and get some more cocaine.

[00:29:37.530] 
And cocaine is just a ritual form of staying in touch with this stuff after you're so fatigued that you would be asked.

[00:29:50.030] 
But if your defenses are good enough, you would just get depressed. And so whenever you're really depressed, the question to ask yourself is simple well, how have I been getting too close to some archetype? Which one is it?

[00:30:15.510] 
How do I need to come down a little bit? In other words, the paradoxical thing is you have to come down in order to get the energy back. You have to get off the high chair in order to access the energy again. Remember, this isn't true for psychotic. Yes.

[00:30:39.290] 
How does that feel?

[00:30:44.990] 
Well, in morning it's kind of a different thing as you're sort of a normal neurotic person that's had a major loss in that you've had a world ectomy or a world oxy, your world is just gone and you've had a major loss. Your cosmos has been destroyed and so you're having a major loss and it has put you into a transition state. And in a transition state, you are particularly vulnerable to archetypal invasions. Here's the rule, folks. When you had a major loss, you're just like a landing pad for archetypes.

[00:31:31.150] 
Major loss. It's like in close encounter for the third time.

[00:31:42.050] 
And so you can see this, that the depression is a way of really limiting the infusion of these energies that would come in your ordinary world, is going to extraordinary world. This is why when you are in major losses, you tend to get all these religious experiences crisis in your life. Religious experiences translate archetypal encounters.

[00:32:17.450] 
In other words, if you think about what the individuation process is what is it that you want to develop as a mature person from this point of view? Well, you want to develop the capacity to relate to these energy sources and these patterns and potentials in a way that really fuels you and inspires you and fills you out and fills you up so that your cup runs over a little bit, not too much.

[00:32:52.230] 
And in other words, so that you feel the fullness what you call the pluroma, you feel the fullness of life. In other words, if you're accessing this stuff, if you're accessing it right, you will not be depressed.

[00:33:13.870] 
If you're accessing it much too little, you will probably be depressed. And if you jack it up too fast and overload the circuits, it'll pop you down into depression. So what you want to do is like in flight refueling. You want to learn how to come up behind the mothership just right, and you don't want the nozzle coming to the windshield and you want to fuel, and then you want to go off and do your work, and then you want to come back to it and refuel. And then you want to go off and do your work, but you don't want to fly up into the belly of the plane.

[00:34:02.910] 
And this is the kind of metaphor that helps you understand what young man and what somebody like. If you want to get a real good treatment of this, read Edward Eddinger's little book called Ego and Archetype. It's laid out there ego and archetype. And he talks about the ego self axis. Remember that's the ego capital S, archetypal self axis.

[00:34:29.580] 
It means a relationship. Yes.

[00:34:34.470] 
When you go out to mothership, you want IV drip and a mainline connection, right? Well, you want the amount that your tanks can take without bursting. And you want the flow to be at some kind of a regulated rate. And then you want to be able to detach, for example. See, optimally, if you have therapeutic experience that works, you shouldn't be finally addicted to the therapist.

[00:35:20.790] 
For those of you in Freudian therapy I'm sorry, get into that. Why? Freudian therapy has to have people in therapy so much, so long, because it's built into their metapychology. There's no way out of analysis if you're a fraud because since they don't believe in archetypes, the fraud and analysts don't know they're an archetype. They don't know that they receive an archetype of transference and they don't know of any way in which the person could without them.

[00:36:02.550] 
And so they maintain an archetypal transference forever when the task of the union analyst is to return you to your archetypal self. A lot of union analysts don't do that, but that's not because of the theory. That's because of whatever that's confusing from what you said before, that you can't merge with your archetype. So you're talking about returning you to your types of mastery or something like that with an axis. The task of analysis is not to make you an edit.

[00:36:51.010] 
Analysis is to help you form an axis with your architect itself that you can manage in your own ritual ways. See, one of the things I talk about, the fourth section, is ritual means of monitoring your relationship.

[00:37:11.530] 
The point is that if I don't understand that I have an inner magician, I will have to project it on you and relate to you as my magician. That's probably necessary early on, but then soon you should have your own relationship with your inner magician. If you're in analysis with me, you should be able to take that back, and I should become more ordinary. And your own numinoscopy would be something you relate to inside, and you should be free of me. I hope you like me, but I wouldn't be on retainer forever.

[00:37:50.240] 
That's the key difference.

[00:37:54.070] 
So in other words, the ego self axis is the goal. And this is true for every one of these major archetypes.

[00:38:07.050] 
And you want to be able to develop your ego, your own conscious, mature self, to the extent that you can make decisions about when you need to be in touch with the king, say more, or when you need to be in touch with the lover more, or when you need to be in touch with the warrior more. Because if you don't have that kind of consciousness and that kind of self mastery, then the system has not done its job for you. And we also want access to our female. Exactly. Very similar.

[00:38:49.690] 
All these things interact with each other in a mutually regulating way. And if you're not in touch with each of these on some fairly regular basis and some conscious basis, then you're condemned, acting out. You can't make it by the right balance of these four male. I think that's accurate.

[00:39:13.470] 
Well, he's saying that you can't simply make it in terms of a man, for example, by simply relating to the four male archives. I would say that's right, because that totally avoids the animal dynamic. The inner feminine contra sexual. But in many ways, we've got a lot more men that are on better terms with their feminine than they are in terms of their masculine. Maybe you can tell us a little about these archetypes before we let me just go over them briefly.

[00:39:46.250] 
So the goal is accessing, not being possessed by it. If you're possessed by it, you just incarnated it. It's used you to incarnate. That guy out in Stockton wasn't himself anymore. The human self disappeared and this killing machine took place.

[00:40:18.550] 
The warrior archetype, when it is possessing you, turns you into a killing machine just as deadly as Joel's and no more human than Jaws.

[00:40:34.730] 
So in any case, these four operate in the male psyche. And let me just tell you briefly what they do, and then we'll get more into the warrior.

[00:40:50.290] 
We'll discuss this.

[00:40:55.090] 
The king is the archetype of order.

[00:41:00.610] 
Without this, you will be extremely anxious.

[00:41:07.590] 
To the extent that you're a male and you're nervous, you're out of touch with this.

[00:41:16.570] 
Even if you're like, kind of overly organized.

[00:41:22.970] 
If you're an obsessive compulsive type, you're very much out of touch with me. Obsessive compulsives have a lot of warrior, not much king.

[00:41:38.030] 
The king is also an archetype, the archetype of blessing and a man. Without the king, he will not be a good father or a good mentor.

[00:41:56.950] 
Say that without that related to in a conscious way.

[00:42:02.390] 
If the king possesses him, he will be a narcissistic personality disorder.

[00:42:12.010] 
Little Lord Paul Roy on his high chair throne what we call the Shadow King. A lot of executive Shadow king, but the purpose of it is it's associated with the Axis Mundi, the center of the world in mythology. The king is the center of the world in mythology. I recommend that you look at John Perry's book the Lord of the Four Quarters.

[00:42:51.990] 
It is the means by which fertility enters the world.

[00:42:58.410] 
In ancient cultures, the king was one with the source of fertility. If the king you've heard the rainmaker story. If the rainmaker goes into the dow, everything works. That's a derivation of a story about the sacred king. Not a Rainmaker king, it's the emperor.

[00:43:22.070] 
It's a Chinese emperor.

[00:43:29.250] 
To be a warrior in the truest sense, you have to have a king.

[00:43:37.670] 
You don't have a sacred king. You're not a warrior.

[00:43:43.830] 
You may be a killer. You're not a warrior in the archetypal sense. We'll see more about why that is in a minute or you'd be a soldier. You'd be a soldier. The soldier is not soldier.

[00:44:03.790] 
A human expression of this thing.

[00:44:08.590] 
The archetypal reality is much more what we would mean in our culture by night than night.

[00:44:19.410] 
The soldier as we know it has to have a general in order to have any chance of being a warrior in the sense in which this set up archetype that's usually profane instead of that's true. That's true in human history back and take the Vietnam War. There were very few warriors in the Vietnam War, a lot of boy warriors. But a lot of the atrocities that were committed when you get atrocities committed like we see in so much of the literature on Vietnam War you see that because of the extent to which pooh air psychology ran the entire war from the generals down from the president down to the generals. And that's one of the things we want to get into a lot more.

[00:45:14.650] 
See, there are a lot of people, for example, even William Manchester, the biographer of Microsoft he's written a biography about one of the greatest generals of all time and he doesn't understand this stuff at all. He has no understanding because he thinks when he talks about macros and macros's values and everything, he accused him of being a 19th century militarist that's all he could think of to say about this. He has no understanding whatsoever about the archival ground of being a general or any of that stuff. And so he ends up a Manchester. I don't believe you've seen this book.

[00:45:54.550] 
It's entitled American Caesar, and it's out in the film version. You can get it. It's a film biography of MacArthur. They don't understand MacArthur at all. But in any case, you got to have a warrior.

[00:46:11.280] 
You have to have the king, or equivalent, because you have to have someone to be loyal to. You have to have someone to be faithful to. It has to be simplified. You have to be always faithful. And see, today people think that's a joke.

[00:46:27.450] 
People think the Marine motto is a joke. But it's not a joke if you understand this stuff. It's not a joke at its archetype of core. And to the extent that this reality we're discussing in these four sessions, to the extent that it is a human reality, the only person who knows anything about faithfulness, including marital faithfulness, is the archetype of warrior. Faithfulness is a warrior virtue.

[00:47:02.630] 
You don't have this thing. You don't know even the slightest idea about devotion or faithfulness to anybody, to anything.

[00:47:12.730] 
Faithfulness is not a virtue of the king. Do you get it?

[00:47:19.470] 
Jesus or the love or the magician.

[00:47:29.790] 
Now, one of the qualities about the king that evolved this day, the archetype, he speaks order and he speaks blessings. You got to get a sense for what the king. We don't know anything about kingship today, because the only definition of a king see, the word sacred king is alliteration almost it's a repetition, an unnecessary tautology, because a king is sacred. In human culture, to the extent that you get anything like a sacred king, it's not a king anymore. It's just sort of a figurehead thing.

[00:48:07.400] 
But in human culture, the king, to the extent that he was a sacral king, you got to read Golden Bow, Fraser's, Golden Bow. Get a sense about what it was like to be king in a world. They were God, or they were the vicar of God, the deputy of God. The closest thing is the Pope. If you're a devout Catholic and your feelings about the Pope, pope is in that archetype of the king.

[00:48:36.390] 
The papacy is the closest thing, really, to the archive of the king to get today, except here, or he does that interesting thing to think about what's going to happen in Japanese culture and life now, because now, for the first time in history, they are without a king in the sense of sacred king. But the fact is, he's magic. He is the source of all order and lives. This is the father archetype in all of its potency. And this is the thing that's behind the reason we're all dissatisfied with our fathers, because no real father could ever possibly be good enough.

[00:49:25.090] 
See, that's why. All these fraud and fancies of good enough mother and a good enough father. There never wants one. Do you ever need anybody that has one good enough mother or a good enough father? That's because they're archetypes and they're magic, and any real person will not adequately embody it.

[00:49:47.500] 
They will fail in embodying it mean there's not enough quality time of the day. It wouldn't matter how much quality time the new papa came about now. Cause what you say about your unsatisfactory mother and father, everybody raving about it not to say that it's not important. When you say good enough, you mean to mediate this structure in a way that's good enough for a person to be able to build some internalization. So it's not that it's unimportant.

[00:50:23.280] 
It's just that the Freudians, because they don't have any kind of this kind of metaphysical they have to blame the mother sort of major in blaming the mother. Well, right, blame the mother, only blame the father. But the point of it is that they have this priestly task. They have to mediate this divine reality in such a way that in a way that's good enough for the person to be able to kind of embody it slowly for themselves. And it's hard to do negative magician.

[00:51:03.310] 
It's the archetype of awareness, knowledge, knowing. It's the archetype of introversion. It's having an inner line. When you get Robert Johnson's book Inner Work, that's the book about being becoming Omega, becoming your own magician. And to the extent that you're in analysis or working on your own awareness of your dynamics, you are developing your inner magician.

[00:51:34.030] 
The magician is there to know and to interpret. The magician is not there to order. The magician is not there to love. The magician is not there to fight. The magician is there to know.

[00:51:54.230] 
What is the shadow side of the magician? Well, the shadow side of magician is that's all they do is no everybody's criticism of academics. They're criticizing the shadow magician because you know what a shadow magician will do is you'll be working on some problem and the shadow magician will say you're working on a practical problem. This is like the University of Chicago. University of Chicago.

[00:52:26.870] 
They try very hard not to ever work on anything practical because it's not as prestigious as working on things matter theoretically or mathe.

[00:52:40.530] 
At the University of Chicago School of Social Work. We just study theories. At the Jane Adams School of Social Work, they said you've heard of deconstructionism, the new Hermeneutics deconstructionism, that's where you interpret things until you can't find any meaning anywhere. That's the shadow magician, because the shadow magician can't find any meaning anywhere. He's most impressed, though, with his capacity to interpret.

[00:53:14.200] 
With that, let's take a short break. The function of the lover before we go on.

[00:53:24.930] 
Whereas the king centers, orders and blesses, and the warrior enables one to focus and fight and a number of other things the Megas enables you to know, be aware, develop inwardness and fancy to reflect. The lover is the archetype of appreciation, delight, joy, valuing.

[00:53:59.150] 
And of course in this schema, all of these things are stereotypes and very inhuman if they are not informing each other. One of the things we'll talk about is what the warriors like when there's not enough king, what the warriors like when there's not enough negatives, what the warriors like when there's not enough lover, and that sort of thing. But you get a my lie. For example, when there's not enough lover, yeah, you get a my lie, you get atrocities. When there's no capacity to value human, when human life becomes just cannon fodder.

[00:54:57.870] 
This thing is way out of whack.

[00:55:04.210] 
Well, let me talk a little bit now about this b here, king Cosmos Chaos. That is what you've got to get clear about is in this archetypal realm, chaos is always encroaching.

[00:55:29.130] 
King's throne is at the center of the world. You notice these trinity cosmogonies the throne is always here. Christians, that's the cross.

[00:55:42.910] 
The cross is at the same time the throne, the place where the king is the king of the world. On the cross, ultimate order comes through the cross. For Christian and the blood of Christ, as in the transformation symbolism of the mass, is the food of immortality. Blessings, all blessings come through the cross. But there are always the forces of disorder.

[00:56:19.450] 
And what else? If it's order and life, then it must be disorder. And what forces of death are always encroaching. And so in terms of the primitive world, say let's take King David for example, we've got to be god as warrior.

[00:56:48.610] 
As long as things are fine, the King can sit on the throne and enjoy holding court. But whenever the forces of Philistines, Gideonites, whatever you may call it, those that would encroach on your world start coming in. Then the archetypal king gets off the throne and becomes a general.

[00:57:25.550] 
There you get the King in his role as commander in chief, President. Then there's the President as commander in chief. When the president becomes the commander in chief, he has become the archetypal general. And this is Caesar.

[00:57:48.710] 
And the war is against those who would disorder the world, against those that would cause the world to become a barren place. This is King Author and Roundtable. You see the roundtable here, the roundtable is nothing but a mandala image of an ordered, creative, fertile world.

[00:58:19.790] 
And what happens to destroy this camelot? Think about the myth.

[00:58:33.430] 
What happens? That was something about that particular story seduces Lancelot.

[00:58:44.230] 
See, Lancelot is an interesting study here. You look at the way these archetypal images work in that story because you get it all there. You've got the lover part, you got Merlin the Magician, Megas, you got Lancelot in his various aspects and you've got problems. And we'll get, in a minute we'll get into Lancelot's problem.

[00:59:12.290] 
And in that story you get the initiatory motif of the night, you get the movement from white knight to red knight to black knight. That's what we'll go through and that is an archetypal progression we'll get into in a minute. But you've got to understand that the knife does not exist without this.

[00:59:39.130] 
The knights of the roundtable functions on behalf of this. He's not freelance, no such thing as a freelance warrior in the archetype sense. There's no such thing as a freelance mercenary. Mercenary is not a warrior in the sense that this is talking about because if your gun is for higher to the highest bidder you're a killer not a warrior.

[01:00:19.110] 
So in other words the King and the world, the cosmos you got to understand the tension in the mythical world between cosmos and chaos and you've got that polarity in all of these mythic structures. King, cosmos, chaos and the Knight exists in service to the King on behalf of the right order.

[01:00:58.450] 
In other words the Knight functions not on his own behalf and does not act out of some personal schema. The Knight operates on behalf of the dow and so to speak the right order. Different mythologies. Again let me refer you to John Perry's book Lord of the Four Quarters and also his roots of renewal and myth and madness where he talks about the way in which the King is associated directly with right order. In other words the King's legitimacy is one with just social organization.

[01:01:51.410] 
Well is the commitment more to right order than the King? For instance if the King becomes out of the right order and it's the duty of an archetypal speaking now you're talking about humans but archetypally speaking, the true King. See this is really what you and I would say is this is talking about God.

[01:02:18.010] 
I mean when you're speaking of the archetypal realm you're not talking about human and human beings. But that's very interesting when you study what actually happened in sacral kingship in the primitive past you read the Golden Bow on that Fraser's Golden Bow. It's very interesting because see, whenever the King didn't produce, he got killed.

[01:02:44.930] 
This Queen per day was based on King for a day and was based on the idea that they would make you king and then they would kill you. And there are a lot of stories and you ought to try to get a hold of the Golden Bow during your time. We're working on this and read about this because the King, they would put one guy the Golden Bow, the word the Golden Bow comes from the idea that the King had to be able to pluck the Golden Bow out of a certain tree and a certain sacred grove. The only way you could pluck that was first to kill the person guarding grove who was the King. And so your job when you were selected would be to go in there and if you were going to be king, you would be able to get to the guy and kill him and then take the golden bow down and you would be king until they sent somebody else or somebody else came to you.

[01:03:52.200] 
What you got to get a sense for is in the ancient world, the psychological meaning of the Totem, because this is like totemism, you know, about Totemism. Have you heard about the tribes that if the statue, the sacred totem statue of the tribes are stolen, everything stops. It's the idea of the soul of the persons being carried by a totem object or totem animal. And if this thing is displaced, then chaos breaks loose. Well, the king was the primal total.

[01:04:30.710] 
So the king, the primal king in that very primitive time would carry and affect the soul of the tribe. And so if things weren't going well, then you knew what the problem was. The interesting thing about this, it wasn't fun being king. Because even when you were king, before they killed you, they had you fixed up so that you could never you've heard of the red carpet treatment? You know what that was for?

[01:05:06.630] 
Think about it, man. You could never step off the carpet, never step on the ground. And not only that, because if you did, you lose your charge, right? You lose your mana, you lose your numerous power. And not only that, you couldn't look at the sun.

[01:05:24.950] 
Now, why couldn't you look at the sun? A lot of them, they never let them see the light of day. Why not think about that? Why would you not want the king to see the sun? He is the sun.

[01:05:40.830] 
He would be overpowered and he would lose his charge like a battery. Get it? Therefore, the concept of insulation becomes very important in the primitive world. And what do we call insulation in the primitive world?

[01:05:57.570] 
Taboo.

[01:06:00.690] 
Taboo. Things are taboo. It works like insulation. The reason you have a taboo is because you get pride and it loses its power. So in the Bible, the Ark of the Covenant is loaded with this numerous powerful energy.

[01:06:16.700] 
And if you touch it, even though he gets from falling, you get killed. In a totally type society, if the king is in failure to save, like this movie Fisher King type thing, you don't want the king until such time as he succeeded. So everything is going. Everybody knows that he's got to go.

[01:06:38.190] 
And you get this sort of the blood and the water transit. It's like in any organization, the king is wounded.

[01:06:50.690] 
Yeah, but I mean, like in a business, for example, in a company, if the king is wounded, everybody sort of they call it rat getting off the ship. Nobody is friendly with that executive once they know that it's lost his mind. Richard Nixon and Watergate. Yeah.

[01:07:18.030] 
And of course, the frenzy that occurs with the press and this operates wonderfully once human beings smell blood and water, once they kind of get a sense that they are the king is over, then everybody wants to get in on the act and kill kill the king. Because, of course, if you kill him, you get a little bit of the energy. The same thing behind warriors counting coup in primitive tribes. When you killed another warrior, you didn't just kill them to kill them. No one body counts.

[01:07:56.550] 
You killed their power. And the greater the warrior you were, the more accumulation of warrior power you had. I think Mayans really never stand up.

[01:08:11.610] 
Yes, Mayans. All those absolutely right body. And once you begin to get a feel for this psychic economy, you get a lot better feel for primitive cultures in general. When you study them, like the mind, you get muscles. Oh, I see how this operates.

[01:08:37.350] 
Now, I understand the relationship between them, the rain god and sacrifice, but also killing animals. You get the animals power. Yes. And of course, the killing of animals, according to a lot of people, and I think this is right that is a sort of a development of the old team not to kill the king.

[01:09:03.870] 
We're not going to kill you. We're going to kill the goat. Slightly. The story of Abraham and Isaac. Well, I'm going to kill the son, but all of a sudden, I got this goat.

[01:09:16.950] 
Well, there you see a little structuralization in the psychic, little bit less archetypal acting out. And there are a lot of theorists, psychoanalytic theorists, that think that the Christian myth is based on the kind of moving away from this killing eating king and that the eucharist is really a substitute for the actual killing. And ritual cannibal ingestion of the body of the actual king. Which was so, in other words, what you've got is a situation in which order is threatened a lot.

[01:10:11.010] 
And when order is threatened, you got what have you got? Well, you got the enemy, and they're always coming in from out here. See, the true enemy is not a fifth column. See, it's not just me inside.

[01:10:35.290] 
So when you've got the archetype of the warrior at the exact time you have the archetype of the warrior, you've got the archetype of the enemy, it's not possible to have a warrior without an enemy. These things raised together, because if there's no chaos, there's no fight.

[01:11:07.330] 
Now, what happens on this the it's world and armageddon.

[01:11:26.170] 
See, when you're in the warrior archetype, when you're when this thing is constellated, you got war.

[01:11:38.830] 
Doesn't make any sense to have warrior archetype without war. And so you've got this reaching of the Tao in some sense, by dow, you mean the Chinese Tao? Yes, which is another word for just the same thing that the Dharma or the Egyptian Ta. But it's the concept of right order. It's what the Bible, the Judeo Christian Bible talks about is righteousness.

[01:12:12.810] 
Righteousness or the torah, the law and the law. The Torah is not a scroll. Torah is righteousness. And it's like in the Hebrew scriptures, it says, let righteousness roll down mighty stream that's dow. That is the right order.

[01:12:43.910] 
Just order.

[01:12:47.990] 
Okay? So you get warrior, you got the enemy.

[01:12:59.370] 
Now, in order to understand this, you've got to understand that this is archetypal, not human. Be clear about this.

[01:13:12.110] 
The human psyche is set up with these archetypal polarities. What do we get? Well, juniors don't talk about this enough, but what you get is you get the forces of right and the forces of wrong. You get the forces of good and you get the forces of evil. In other words, right at the root in the psychic, at this archetypal level is an archetype of dualism.

[01:13:38.390] 
Where do you get it? Most clearly, you get it in Zoroastrianism Persian religion. You've got the good God and the bad God. You've got a Hura Mazda, and you've got a Hiraman. Now, later on in the development of religions, this kind of drops away a lot.

[01:14:04.030] 
And you get all these sophisticated theologians that talk about, well, there's no devil, they're just the truth. They're just God, the white alien process God, who does all these things. And you get the God, the philosophers. But that's not where human beings have always lived. The more primitive and primal, the more archetypal.

[01:14:29.130] 
What you get in the archetypal treatment to this thing is you get God, the good God, and you get the evil God.

[01:15:01.570] 
There is your archetypal battle. It is at the root of this thing archetypally. And whenever you get there's no such thing as a secular war.

[01:15:18.150] 
All wars at some level are sacred. They're good. It just means they're archetypes.

[01:15:27.770] 
And you've got this conflict, and this locust of the conflict is in the psyche. That is the way the world is structured when this archetype is consolated. In other words, wherever this warrior archetype comes up. There's this scene in Patent. I've got to give you your assignments, your movie assignments.

[01:15:52.340] 
I haven't given you a movie assignment. A patent is the first one. I want you to see Patent. I want you to see Mac author movie. I want you to see a bunch more.

[01:16:06.530] 
But there's a scene in Patent which is the which is this arms act. I mean, here, Doris, is got the tanks lined up around the hill here under camouflage. And Rommel's tanks are coming out across the plane. There's armageddon North Africa in that scene. That's Armageddon.

[01:16:34.510] 
And Patton, according to the way it's presented in the movie, is in his fantasy. He clearly sees himself as a knight in service of the true God. And he sees Rommel tonight in the service, and he's scoping out with binoculars, looking at this plane, and he loves it. And it feels so right. From the very beginnings of his life, he has waited for this moment.

[01:17:08.970] 
This moment. This is the moment and the reason it's the moment is because that's one of the deepest archetype structures in human psyche and he's always felt called to be the leader of men in this great struggle. Think that changed scene about one step further. I believe he made the statement also that the reason he was successful in that was that he had read a book that Raleigh had written about such a battle if you look at it archetype it was like knowing the shadow side of himself. Yes.

[01:17:43.110] 
He says, Romeo, you magnificent bastard, I read your book, so thank you. See, you can't eat that without Ronald. Oh, yes. When he found out that Mama wasn't commanding those things he is the vicar of the true God and Lamo would be the vicar of the evil gun.

[01:18:17.710] 
And here we have all of history convinced and he even says to his aid I want you to watch that movie carefully. Because he says to his aid well, if it was done the way it ought to be done rama would get in his tank and button up and I would get in my tank, we would do it, whoever won. That would be the decision.



The Warrior Within 03	[00:00:00.250] 
What's your analysis of him? Are you saying this is constellated? Is this I mean, it seems to work pretty good and that in him? I mean, it seems like that's not, I mean, a psychotic thing. I mean, it seems like it works well in general.

[00:00:21.890] 
If you're fighting Panzer divisions. You sure as hell better be accessing this archetype pretty heavy. When you see a bunch of tiger tanks when you see a bunch of tiger tanks coming out across the plane of the German infantry and large force behind them, and you don't have very much of this, you run or you do, like Montgomery did, who didn't have as much of this archetype, contrary to what people thought. You study it a lot. You study a lot, and you wait until you have a sure victory, until you get so many forces, you've got a sure victory, which means you don't fight as often. But that right there, you see, if you look at that scene carefully in the movie, and you know what you should know by now, Ms. Torres, you will see the archetype of structure. This is the primal combat. This is the primal combat.

[00:01:26.090] 
And whenever the archetype of the warrior is constellated in any kind of serious way, there is this constellated. In other words, you will have a sense of the plane, and you will have a sense of the decisive activity that's called for, and you will have a sense of risking everything. And what we've got to do in this course is to try to get some sense about what that's about inside. What is that for? Is that just one of the leftover parts of acceleration, which some people would argue feminists have said for some time, you know, that males are a cause of war, something about male psyche, and there is a sense in which they are on to something. That is to say, I think it is true that this particular archetype is more dominant in masculine psychology. It's not absent from feminine psychology by any means, but this makes it even more important to get some sense about what it's for and how to use it, because the idea that you're ever going to get the Patton out of men, you might go get it. It's going to be in there, and they're either going to be slapping soldiers that are helpless, as he did.

[00:03:13.790] 
He's an interesting study to study, the shadow side of this archetype, because Patton, even more than MacArthur, had a lot of immature streaks in him, and he manifested the shadow warrior a good bit in his relationships with other men and with other generals. We'll see that a little bit. But do you get a sense of what I'm talking about? Warrior, if you have access to this, you will know what your enemy is. And if you don't know what your enemy is, you don't have access to it, period. Now, next week, we'll spend a lot more time talking about how that set up to function in science in a positive way. What is the point I want you to be thinking about this week? What are the positive uses of that.

[00:04:18.450] 
Neurobiology though dialectically?

[00:04:24.530] 
I think that it's based in brain structure and I don't think you're ever going to get rid of it for that reason. This is in the hard wiring not the software.

[00:04:37.290] 
Is there in fact a great idea between male and female conditioning?

[00:04:46.510] 
Well I think I think that we don't know as much about this as we will know before too long. But my guess is that there are significant gender differences on this problem particularly on this one and that makes the male, of the species a big problem for the planet. That's the question. See a Jungian would not say that it's social conditioning. What is social conditioning and social conditions is how this is addressed and what kind of use or utilization is made of this and what kind of interpretation and socialization education around this archetype. And my concern is very simple that is happening now among a lot of people is that they think that this thing can be excised by resocialization in some way. I don't think that for a minute. I think that the only option really is to find ways to help this thing before I would use what word in this context. What you hope you can do with this thing is to help people find appropriate sublimations. And Freudians always sort of make the way they use language. It makes it sound like you're really not letting this out when in fact I would argue that what it is for is to be manifested in mature ways and that is not sublimation. I would call that mature expression of it.

[00:06:56.710] 
I'm sorry to deal with the pathological but I'm thinking about the Stockton character again. Would he have imagined would his warrior archetype imagine that there is an enemy there or is it just that the warrior archetype just goes berserk and kills?

[00:07:13.590] 
No this thing there is method in this. That wasn't his oldest. They were looking he dressed up. I mean this was a ritual occasion. He dressed up in his black jacket and he had a diversionary tactic. I mean this was the ritual drama. If you're Freudian you think well he lost it. That's the Freudian thing. You lose it because it isn't that simple. Because when you regress from a Jungian point you don't just kind of become jailed you regress into a structure and he regressed into this structure and then all of a sudden he's got his AK 47 and everything's structured. It's the scene, this program was this scene he was a sacred warrior. He was fighting good fight.

[00:08:15.310] 
What was the enemy?

[00:08:16.730] 
 It was the devil. Well Satan is the archetype enemy in this thing. That's just another word for  Satan.

[00:08:27.110] 
Satan with little kids?

[00:08:28.320] 
Sure and think about how easy that would be for you. To the extent that you cannot stand the boy, the uninitiated boy in yourself, to the extent you're not on terms with the vulnerable boy in yourself, you will pathologize and demonize the infantile boy, the typical so called macho man, demonizes the boys within him. And that's what makes them homophobes. Homophobia is directly related to this demonization of the passive, uninitiated master. So what you want to do is get rid of that which is not consistent with my idealized self image. So I'm quite sure this guy was killing his inner boy and his inner child. Because if you are an uninitiated male, you cannot stand people who are strong and you cannot stand people who are weak. On the one hand, you envy the strong ones and you hate the weak ones because they remind you of your own weakness and vulnerability. So you got Christ, the way Jung puts it up. And what you got to get a sense for a lot of Jungians, top Jungians, romanticize the archetype of self. They think it's friendly. Well, part of it is. But in Jung's understanding, you get this polarity in the archetype of self.

[00:10:32.180] 
You've got structured like this, christ on one side and you got Satan on the other. And so again, this archetypal ground in here is plane of conflict. And so whenever this archetype is formed, you need an enemy and you need a battle and you need a plane of operations and because you need something to do reconnaissance on and you need something to strategize on. Well, what did you study? You study military tactics. It's all in the military. It's all in west points. That is, you learn, you learn about strategy and tactics. See if this archetype is not constellated in you. You'll never think strategy and tactics about anything. Won't do much planning. There are a lot of people that live their lives that way. You believe that they never really plan anything out. For example, and this is true in every realm person's life. It's like every day, the day comes and it goes and the day comes and it goes. Next day comes and it goes with no warrior, no strategy, no battle plan. King doesn't mess with that stuff when he's on the throne. Everybody does that for him. It's the warrior archetype that strategizes and knows where it wants to go.

[00:12:58.310] 
Where does he want to go? Wants to go right straight through them and kill the king or kill the other general. And if you study Alexander the Great, don't get hold of this. I mean, he walked around, he was a god king, god king warrior. And it's amazing they used to study Alexander because to study this stuff, because there's so much function, pleasure in the warrior when it's really online. Alexander just love he would scope out the enemy's defenses and then he would think, where do they think I'm going to attack? Well, they think I'm going to attack over there where it's kind of weak, but I'm not going to attack where it's weak. I'm going to find the strongest point in their line and I'm going to lead the charge. We're going to go right through it. Look at that. Think about that. You really get a sense of the archetypal nature of that. That's not later on generalship. That's the archetypal general. That's the general like Patton, who doesn't like it. If the other guy is not Rommel, he wants to take on the strongest and beating that.

[00:14:36.010] 
So would you say that this of the formula type, is the one structure?

[00:14:45.290] 
This is your obsessive compulsive favorite archetype. This is the one the obsessive compulsive notice best. The obsessive compulsive doesn't have much else. This is the archetype of doing action. You take action, you got this. If you think about it a lot, you don't have it if you just think about it a lot and you spend most of your time thinking

[00:15:20.470] 
what you have a lot of magus that's the academic city and the academics sit around. The academics you present homelessness to the academics don't really happen. How serious? This is one problem. And to the extent that the academics are running any particular area, they will study the hell out of it and they write books on it. They're not going to cure it. And when that thing runs away, you just get no action about anything. And if it gets the magician thing gets so popular personality, they can't even write to it. Because you see, if you get so consumed with a magician, then you can see through your own arguments! What they study. You get too smart and whatever they are. But to the extent that you are a person of action, this is your archetype.

[00:16:46.290] 
Are there mature examples of this all over the place? Mature? Sure.

[00:16:58.390] 
The thing is, when you say a mature example, you're talking about somebody that has got enough contact with the other ones that they're able to keep this thing from driving them a workaholic. You wouldn't call a mature example of it because the workaholic and we'll get into this more when we talk about pathology workaholic, just see one of the interesting things about it one of the interesting things about it is that this thing carries its own anesthesia, carries accountable painkillers. And if you've got a lot of this in your psyche, one of the things you notice about yourself is when you really get tired, you stop being able to tell you're tired. And that's the syndrome of the workaholic. Because when they really start getting fatigued, they can't tell us because they regress into this. And when you regress into this, you don't feel pain too much. You get more and more stamina. You get more and more focus. You get less and less self concern. You get more and more focused on the task. You can lie in a bed of fire ants and not feel the stings.

[00:18:33.750] 
Your G. Gordon Liddy, you put your hand in the plane and not feel the pain. And that has certain positive sides to it. We'll be getting into what that's for next week? What is that for, that capacity to not feel the pain? But this is the shape of it. You get the enemy, the field of conflict, and you have the requirements for the leader here because the warrior, in this sense, is going to be the person who marshals the forces. It's not going to attack everywhere at once. It will strategize. And as Patton put it, it's a good place for us to stop tonight. This archetype will attack and it will attack and it will attack and it will keep on attacking until it has won or it is dead. This archetype doesn't know anything about retreating. And so we talk about assertiveness. Assertiveness. This is the archetype of assertiveness. And next week we will look at the uses of it. Following week we'll look at the pathology of it. And the last week we'll look at trying to get in touch with this in a way that might be healthy for you.

[00:20:38.090] 
Thank you a lot.

[00:20:41.370] 
Last week, with all the cultural examples that I wanted to give you. And I'd like to finish that as quickly as I can tonight. And then we'll turn to our scheduled topic for the evening, which is looking at the potential of this archetypal structure, the archetype of the warrior. And let me just review quickly with you the assumptions that we're operating on with regard to archetypal psychology and the relationship between ego and archetype. Remember, I said last week the problem to understanding the archetype is to understand that the thing is really very imperialistic. It does not respect boundaries. Archetypes don't respect persons. They really sort of have contempt for humans. Basically. The Greeks used to talk about the gods and their sort of snide attitudes toward humans. Well, that's consistent with what we talk about in terms of archetypes. But remember, archetypes don't regulate themselves. They organize psychology and behavior. And they do it when not confronted with a pretty strong ego. They do it compulsively. They will compel certain patterns of behavior. And so you got in the psyche, you've got so many different archetypes. I mean, you can do it in terms of the gods and goddesses in every woman in the way that Jean Bolin does.

[00:23:03.600] 
And she was here Friday, I hope some of you got to hear her lecture. Dionysus or you can cut it the way I cut it, which is in terms of the different kinds of partners in the psyche, male and female. And I divided, as I told you last week, into king and queen, pair of male and female warriors, male and female magicians, male and female lovers. And given that, you got to be clear that without a strong ego development, in the psyche, or what the Kohutans would call a strong cohesive self organization with a little s, the arrangements of these archetypal configurations and patterns in any person's psyche will be compulsive and very rigid. And so to do your thorough archetypal psychology, you have to kind of get a sense about what the dominance in a particular personality are, get a sense about why that is and what would need to happen if they were to individuate, that is, to gain some sense of freedom from compulsion by the archetypal structures. And so that's what your goal is. Your goal is to develop an ego self or ego archetypal self, I prefer to say for purposes of clarity, an ego archetypal self axis in which you are not compelled by any of these things, in which you can access them and be inspired and empowered by these things as is needed or appropriate in what you're facing in life.

[00:25:13.740] 
Hopefully accessing them consciously as much as possible and as non compulsively as possible. Now, next week we're going to go a lot into pathology, particularly around the pathology related to this archetype. And I'm going to get into things like the so called active independent personality, sociopath, borderlines obsessive compulsive personality types, passive aggressive personality types, so forth and so on, to try to kind of show the way in which this thing manifests when it's when it's either accessed compulsively or not accessed directly enough. And we'll talk some about domestic violence and things like that in this context. But tonight I just want to go through some more of this mythological background just as briefly as I can. And then I want to turn to the positive side of this thing. What's it for? What is it there to enable and try to keep us focused on that. So I say all this to say when I'm talking tonight about all the wonderful things about this archetype, I want you to keep in mind all these other things I've said and the fact that we're going to talk about the pathology next week because I'm not going to emphasize a lot about the pathology tonight.

[00:27:05.040] 
Okay? Now, I didn't get to the mysteries of the sword that are so big in human history and I want to spend a little time on that. And then I want to talk a little bit about initiation of the warrior and one of the kind of ways in which this is presented, particularly in Western mythology. And then we'll turn to looking at some of the virtues. First of all, everybody in these circles has heard of Excalibur. One of the things, I mean, I forgot to give you all your film assignments last week, but one of them, I gave you some, but there were some others I didn't mention. I didn't really mention Excalibur as a film. That would be good for you to see in this context because if you see Excalibur, the movie Excalibur, you have a lot of these masculine archetypes really laid out there very sketched, very prominently, and and you get a very powerful sort of mythic representation of all this stuff about the sword Excalibur. So let's get this thing about Excalibur out and get the salient aspects of the mythology of Excalibur out on the table before we see it.

[00:28:51.140] 
Tell us the important things to know about Excalibur. Just jump in. Have the courage to be imperfect. Well, in some versions, that's right. And of course, young ears would have fun with that coming out of the lake. Oh, yeah.

[00:29:13.980] 
Only one person could pull it out of the stuff out of the rock.

[00:29:17.560] 
Right now we need to stay with this thing about that whole image a moment, but go ahead. Somebody else has.

[00:29:31.440] 
Got to be working.

[00:29:34.800] 
Yeah, all this stuff about only the right person. We need to think about what this right person business is can draw this thing from the stone. The thing, of course, is that the sword is in the stone and there's a prophecy about the person that can pull this from the stone becoming king. And of course, there is this thing about the sword singing. And of course, you really get a lot of elaboration of this mythology in Star Wars. I mean, you got to think about the whole Star Wars cycle as picking up a lot of these mythological motifs and particularly this thing about the sword. And remember, in Star Wars, the thing sings. It has a mind of its own. It does its thing. It has a mind of its own. Of course, they're really hitting us with a double whammy with that. The light sword. The light sword. And later on tonight, when we're talking about the thing that this is representing, the whole thing about discrimination, the capacity for discrimination, to put it delicately, to cut the Gordian knot. Capacity to cut the Gordian knot or to put it less delicately, be able to cut through a lot of bullshit.

[00:31:14.640] 
You do what? Precisely.

[00:31:21.300] 
Now, one of the things that we joke a lot about these men and all their preoccupation with their organ, but there's no way to deal with masculine psychology without doing a psychology of the phallus and an archetypal psychology of the phallus and all it represents. We have still that even after the recent very good work that's been done on this, we still are very primitive on this. And we've got to look back through the history of symbolism to get some sense about the enormity of the way in which this imagery of the phallus dominates masculine psychology. And it can be no other way. That's the way it is. So what we do, we look at look at this. I just want to show you for a minute with the king archetype, you get the scepter, often with the orb on it.

[00:32:34.380] 
With the magus, what do you get? The , you get the , or often you'll get the staff of Moses, which is a . So you get a . You, of course, with the warrior, you have the sword and you get the embodiment, you get the lingam, the real thing. Well, it's not no, see, that's a Freudian view. That's not the real thing. That's one expression of the real thing. See, Freud was a literalist freud never had a theory of symbolism. And all those people that try to make Freud into having a theory of symbolism simply don't know anything about symbolism. I mean, Paul Rakur tried to turn Freud into Jung in his book Freud and Philosophy. It doesn't wash. But anyway, so we have the real thing here with the great lingham. And if you go to India, you get all of this frank celebration of the great god Shiva through the archetype of phallus. But it is not just a penis. Some of these guys today like this ethicist, James Nelson, Minneapolis, he's going around a lot talking about men need to learn that it's not really a phallus that they have, it's a penis.

[00:34:32.770] 
And the significant thing about masculine psychology is that it's soft, all right? That's not looking at the archetypal psychology of the masculine, because the celebration of the flaccid penis does not get at the archetypal psychology of the masculine. And so, in other words, with each archetype of the masculine, you get a phallic representation that is never the penis, never penis. In fact, the real truth about men's difficulty with potency is not that they think their penis has to be a phallus, a dagger, some people put it, who don't know anything at all about masculine psychology. Penis is a dagger. What they have most trouble with is not understanding that phallus is an imaginal representation of a psychological and emotional reality that exists in the imaginal realm. Yes, it exists in the psychic realm. It's psychoid. It exists in the homogenal realm. Potency is not something which is mechanical. One gains potency as a man through initiatory processes. One gains potency as a man by getting some sense about what it is to be filled up with this kind of archetypal energy. And the problem with a lot of sex therapies today, they approach masculinity and masculine sexual dysfunction as a mechanical problem.

[00:36:55.930] 
It's never except for very rare cases of cases where people are on medications that make them impotent, so forth.

[00:37:11.360] 
In the realm of American blues mythology, there's expression. It's not the meat.

[00:37:18.660] 
It's not the meat. It's the motion. Yeah, the energy. See, I mean, that's a sense for the kind of connectedness the Hindus would say it's being connected to Shiva. If you're connected with Shiva, you're going to be potent. If you're not, you won't be. Even if you can have an erection, there won't be potency. So anyway, you need to get a sense for the way in which all of these masculine archetypes have these expressions, these phallic expressions. But like Eugene Monica said, phallus is not penis and can't be reduced to that. Okay, so anyway, yes, well, in this context, one has to understand that in terms of the psyche you're talking about what that represents. What is the reality that this presents? And the reality is everything that is represented in the god Shiva in Hinduism. It is tremendous creative energy, you know, boundless movement and so forth and so on and centeredness all these things that we'll talk about more in a minute. But let's go back to Excalibur. See, there's no all I'm doing this far is to show you that see the mythology of Excalibur and all the sword fantasies that males have had throughout history, they take their place in this whole phallic symbolic representation that men are into from very early ages to when they're elderly.

[00:39:42.880] 
Very never get out of this. We wait around till men get out of this. You're going to wait a long time.

[00:39:52.020] 
Um.

[00:39:56.180] 
Now let's go back to Excalibur. What else can you tell me about Excalibur now.

[00:40:04.840] 
Cannot be retrieved until the second coming to work.

[00:40:09.640] 
Okay. Now, when the thing is misused, when you are not worthy of it, it goes disappears. There is something transpersonal that disarms you, in effect. Now, archetypally speaking, we talk about the function of the trickster here. The trickster archetype will get you. If you misuse any form of psychological power, you're riding for a fall because the trickster is going to be constellated. It's one way of saying it, or another way of saying it is you're going to constellate your nemesis. Hubris will constellate a nemesis which will come and disarm you. Look at Hubris. Pride, arrogance will constellate a force which will come and challenge you and disarm you. And so that whole motif about the sword going back in the lake is about that. It's about this idea that just because you have gotten the sword out of the stone, don't assume you can keep it. Would be one way to talk about that would be the shadow. But I wouldn't want that. To get the connotation that this is merely personal shadow. That is to say, the nemesis is that law of opposites that Coincidenta oppositorum that idea that there is an enantiodromia, there is a reversal.

[00:42:14.820] 
When you get into Exaggeration, you're likely to run into the opposite, but it's kind of an inner critique of power. And you can see this in history a lot. For example, you look at the cycle which led from the bombing of Pearl Harbor to the bombing of Tokyo, for example, and the same thing you can do on the Nazi invasions and so forth. They constellated a lot of forces that were going to disempower them and have that purpose. I mean, you see this in many kinds of places, but you also see it in terms of behavior of tyrants. Tyrants always live in fear because they know that they are going to have somebody that's going to be involved in intrigue against them. See?

[00:43:37.740] 
So there's this enantiodromia that happens. But let's meditate a little bit on that thing about being in the stone. Now, we use the water imagery, but what is the stone imagery? The sword in the stone. Why that? What would you say about that? The sword is in the stone and it is difficult to retrieve. Now, what would you say? Say some more about that.

[00:44:04.810] 
Yes, I would say that stone is. A vaginal thing and that male has to separate himself from his mother and away from criminal influences, at least to achieve any kind of use of it, because as long as it's in the skull, it can't be used. It's got to make that separation.

[00:44:31.100] 
If you understand that not in some genital way, if you understand it not in a genital way, that would be accurate. In terms of developmental psychoanalytic, developmental psychology, we would say that to the extent that a man is still embedded in the mother, this is not genital in any sense. It's a symbiotic fusion merger that still exists. It's really prepersonal. And you can think about it. For those of you that are not really psychologically oriented that much, you can think about it as a kind of a psychological Siamese twins with mother, one doesn't know at a deep level where she stops and I start. It's like we're sort of grown together at the unconscious level. And this means that I may have a tremendously elevated view of myself. This is just puer psychology, you know, puer eternists. Well, you know, Jungians love puer ETERNUS. You know, it sounds so nice, puer eturnus. But it really is boy psychology. And boy psychology is behind all the torture in the world, all of the rape, all of the sexual violence, all of the gratuitous oppression in terms of some of the girl psychology gets in on this.

[00:46:26.330] 
But boy psychology is very important in it, and it's not puer eturnist. Oh, how idealistic, how wonderful. The puer. Well, that's a little Jungian romanticism. Puer psychology is not pretty. It's not even all that idealistic. It's really quite narcissistic is what it is. Yes. And see, that's see, that's what you got to see. Puer eternus. God knows all of us men have got a lot of it in us, not playing stones here. But to the extent that one remains a puer, one is very narcissistic and cannot love. And in the context of what this gentleman was pointing out to us is embedded, quote, in the mother. But in order to be fair to mothers, let's understand this is not mother mother. This is the mother. This is the great mother. This is the, you know, body of the universe. I mean, it is not mom. Now, the the boy may feel like it's mom, but to the extent that a son has not. Demythologized his mom. See, she will be a goddess. Yes. What would he say? Well, he just he talks about it, you know, in his traditional view, he talks about it as being a failure of a natural developmental process.

[00:48:40.780] 
You look at Neumann's thing. Neumann has a book on this whole process, and to him, it's very similar to Freud. It's a fixation of a process that should go on, but the person gets arrested. Well, Jung wasn't all that great at talking about all the plumbing on this at that time. I think there's been a lot better work done recently in terms of his failure of masculine initiation, which is what we need to talk about in this. But there's a lot of agreement among depth psychologists and psychoanalytic theorists now about the importance of the role of father in this. If father is not there, and if father is not very assertive in moving in and claiming a son, then the mother is going to be put in a very bad position because she's going to be left with this experience. The son will experience her as all this tremendous power, and the son may hate her guts not for any fault of her own, but because the father has not come in and drawn the son into his orbit of emotional functioning. And so, in effect, the son has not got the connection with the masculine that he needs in order to come away from the mother without having to try to kill her.

[00:50:35.460] 
All this discussion of, well, you got to kill the mother, all that stuff that you often hear about what you got to do to well, if you have an absent or weak, abusive father, you may end up into killing mother fantasies. I think a lot of these men that are very violent and hate women and kill them are men who have been really failed by the men in their lives. Well, see, it's like the mother is never experienced as a human being there by the son. As long as the son is in the mother with a capital M, she is super powerful. You will find men that even in their middle age find mother such an incredibly formidable creature. They cannot relate to her as a human. They relate to her as somebody who has enormous power over them. It's very common among aging puer. But it's not the woman's fault, and it's not really the son's fault because it's the father's fault or the uncle or the grandfather. It's men's fault. It's got to be. And that's one of the things we'll have to talk about, about healing this stuff. See, that's what our last session, we'll talk a lot about this stuff because because men have to reach in there, not blame the women.

[00:52:39.320] 
The man has to reach in there, especially when the boy gets about puberty and he's got to take that boy under his arm up against him where the boy can smell of him. Boy needs to be able to smell a dad, and he's got to be able to get up so close to dad that that's just what Kohut doesn't talk about this as a sexual thing unless you look close. It is this idealization and merger that Kohut talks about. Who is it? Usually dad. We're talking about dad here. The idealization and merger is normally with dad, and it's especially important with son. Well, if your father in there, it's awfully hard to idealize and merge with him. You can idealize with him, but you can't merge with him if you just idealize him. You can't merge with him. It doesn't work right if he is weak and you can see that, and he gets humiliated in the family for everybody to see and feel embarrassed and ashamed of him. For example, dad is driving the car to town, and he hasn't driven the car to town, this particular big town before. And in the car the kids are there and father is being berated because he's not getting around too well in Chicago or Detroit or wherever it is, and he's being humiliated, and the son is hearing this humiliation of the father, and the father is unable to protect himself from this.

[00:54:19.480] 
It is very damaging to the psyche of a pre pubescent or pubescent boy to hear this kind of thing. It's a terrible wound because then it ruins the idealization. See, dad has to be able to be idealized in some way. A lot of dads don't know about this. They don't understand. They get shame and embarrassed. They get son is so proud of him. Dad, I'm so proud of you. What did you do in the war? Oh, wow. I know. You must have been a general. You must have been Rambo three or four or something. Now I peel potatoes in peoria. Fathers need to make like, GI. Joe at that age when the son is needing that. Yeah, I was great, son. They can find out the other later when they don't need you to be GI. Joe.

[00:55:16.050] 
Yeah, it's fine as long as the father can let the son snuggle up close and kind of say, yeah, you're my son, in whom I am well pleased. You're a chip off the old block. But you see, if he's bigger than life, but he doesn't allow merger, which is what a lot of these dudes do. I'm ashamed of you. You a little fruit. Yes. Look at the Great Santini. You see, you get a very adequate male in some senses of that word, but he is so much of a puer, he doesn't know it. A lot of these drill sergeant types are puers to the core, but they don't know it, see? But anyway, so the boy comes up, and I remember there's one person I think about his father. The kid was real thin, and he wasn't real muscular, and his father was a big macho man. And the child would come in, he was about twelve or 13, and the father would say, you little faggot. Get away from me, you little faggot. The boy wasn't homosexual, but the father just could not stand this boy's gawkiness, his awkwardness, you know, he couldn't stand the fact that he was shy.

[00:56:47.840] 
He couldn't stand the fact that he wanted to come in there and fumble things. He couldn't handle tools well. And so the father was constantly brutalizing him verbally. And later on, this guy turned out to be a six foot four, tremendously handsome, powerful man, very successful New York artist. Now, but did he have a lot to overcome? I mean, this negative, what I call the Shadow King business in the father. But this business about being able to get up to and merge, to idealize and merge is so important, and that fails so much of the time. And we'll go into that a lot more when we talk the last session about healing this. Because what you got to do is just a little preview here, right? If you never had your masculinity mirrored by mom, for example, and you never were allowed to idealize and merge with a powerful male who was there and not abusive, then you got wounds in this thing and you got to find ways to heal that, got to find ways to do that. And there are a bunch of ways you can work on that. And we'll really try to get into that a lot.

[00:58:44.760] 
But back to the stone. See, this was a long way around about stone, but I meant to make it very clear that this is not a vagina. You can view it as the mother if you understand you're talking about the great mother and one's merger with this undifferentiated matrix, but you got to understand that's unconsciousness and that as long as that sword is in that stone, you really don't have it. You really do not have access to this thing. It is in this, and you do not feel that you have permission to have it. Men have an enormous problem with this. Even relatively healthy men have a terrible time feeling that they have a right to take the sword out of stone. See, so they say, I'm not the right man. No sense am I trying this. I'm not the right man. No sense am I trying to pull it out.

[00:59:59.490] 
Yeah, I would think that. See, we got to get some sense about what it takes to be able to even try because there's so much guilt associated with having a sword. You know, I mean, there are a lot of folks today, lot of folks today that really say, well, you have a sword, you could hurt somebody.

[01:00:43.280] 
Yes, I had an experience having gone to that lecture on Friday night. She was talking about the Dionysian thing, and I was identifying strongly with who he is. How he is and the impact I've had on some people, but with guilt and with denial and not total flow. And just going through that lecture helped me pull that part of my sword to be the Chinese person that I can be for people.

[01:01:23.100] 
See, what she talked about is the Dionysia Dionysus and all that. I would talk about that in its positive sense as the mature lover. See, when a person has got the mature lover, they've got the good side of the Dionysian thing without the psychosis, your poor Dionysus is really a problem, as he put it to himself. It's really also a mark of this sense of being overwhelmed by the power. See, premature ejaculation. We talk about that some remind me to talk about that next week because well, I'm going to talk about a little bit, but I want to come back to it a lot. No, I think that it's important to see this as a problem that men have in wide areas, not just a genital issue at all. And it has to do with this problem of fear of the power, because the power, when experienced, fragments the personality. I often like to tell you it's like a maserate with bad engine mounts. Well, that's, that's interesting. See, that's an interesting thought. And it would it would fit the sense of it would fit the sense of not feeling comfortable with the power. And what you got to get a sense of is the way in which power will fragment the personality or fragment the ego structure if the individual has not developed and consolidated the capacity to channel this sort of thing appropriately.

[01:03:33.970] 
And that's what this whole a lot about the mythology of the sword, sword, , all of it is about that channeling the power appropriately so that it's not lost or squandered or in some other way. Malfunctioning okay.

[01:03:58.140] 
All this fame and money and power.

[01:04:03.600] 
Yeah, I mean, the staying power with success is another way this works. That is to say, being fragmented by proximity to this kind of energy and power. It's a real problem with creative people. If you're not a creative person, it's not a problem. But if you're a creative person, it's very difficult to be able to regulate the relationship with the creative energy without it making you crazy. And you see a lot of people that burn very brightly for a short period and then they go out either in a bang or a whimper. They go out. Yeah.

[01:05:04.100] 
So on and so forth. And a lot of them have storage in stone. Yes. We make some generalities, like, could I say something like stone is where the individual power, instrumentality, whatever, is lost in male contact with some kind, whereas in the lake stuff, feminine contact, where it's still lost, it's still in the motherboard stuff.

[01:05:31.500] 
Well, I don't know if you'd want to get that definite about the interpretation of symbolism. You could argue that. But you can play. It's a lot of fun to play with that. I don't know that I would kind of put that down in my archetypal interpretation book is the way to interpret stone or lake. But the clear thing is that it's not accessible and that it is in some way unconscious and you do not have access to it. And the capacity to deal with the guilt of approaching it and having access to it is a very important thing. There has to be some sense of rightness. And you talked about permission. Have some sense of permission. Well, one of the things that masculine initiation hopefully does is to offer something about that permission. Permission to be powerful. The Freudians talk about the edible father who is sort of jealous of the son's increasing power. But you can talk about a father who is pleased with the increasing power of the son. And that's the kind of thing that so many men have never experienced. Okay. Anyway, so you can do a lot with this whole thing about drawing the sword from the stone.

[01:07:09.560] 
I think it's important, for example, to think about the difference that has often been made in folklore and in literature about the difference between the kind of man that carries a dagger and the kind of a man that carries a sword. So what is the kind of wrap on that that you've heard?

[01:07:35.330] 
Yes, that's right. It's hidden. It's concealed. See, the idea of the dagger is an idea of concealment. It is an image of passive aggression. We get into that a lot more. It is the approach to masculinity which tries to communicate the message I'm not a threat. I'm not powerful. I'm not a threat. I'm not dangerous. See, and this is typical puer psychology. The immature male will always make a big deal about being kind to animals and children and whales and other living things and not a threat, not in any way a violent person or even capable of being a violent person and not being a threat. Look out for that kind of person because the shadow is very sadistic in that kind of person. Because in other words, just because they do not show a sword does not mean they don't have a blade.

[01:09:16.290] 
In fact, if they don't show a sword, there's a dagger somewhere. Yon Cassius has a mean, lean and hungry look. And so a great deal can be made about wearing the sword, as you say. I think you've got the point, Nolan. I mean, the idea that the man wears the sword out where you can see it. Yeah, I think so. There's a lot that goes with this stuff that doesn't you know, it's not very well understood. I think that there's a statement and you see this a lot in the principles of knighthood, in the principles of samurai, all sorts of things about acknowledgment of the power of the other and their stewardship of this power. The whole ceremony surrounding swords in the military life of the premodern era was related to this. Interestingly enough, there are Japanese firms now that are touring all over America. Guess what? They're buying japanese. But you see lots more money than. Mountains ever thought they could.

[01:11:05.170] 
Exactly. But you see, if you understand this sword symbolism, there's a lot more going on here than buying up World War II trinkets. Because the sword in the life of the Japanese samurai class was a spiritual reality, a masculine reality, an expression of masculine potency and honor. To have your sword taken away is an incredible humiliation. And they're buying back their heritage. And their heritage is a samurai heritage. And so look out when all those swords get back to Japan, it's going to be real interesting. That's a failed samurai, a failed samurai, ashamed samurai. A samurai who's broken his pledge. Well, in effect, he honors the sword, though. I mean, in effect, he is living by the sword. See, for a knight, we'll get into this now. Samurai is just a knight. There's no way to understand the archetype of warrior without understanding chivalry and the knight, because modern professional warriors are not warriors in the sense that they've always been in human history. You really have to study knighthood and all of that ceremonial and ritual and mythology around it, around it. And it had to do with submitting yourself to the sword. The sword was a transpersonal commitment.

[01:13:18.270] 
Why is it that when you become a knight, the sword, you are dubbed with the sword, you come underneath the sword, you submit to the sword. The sword is an emblem of the responsibility of a mature male. It is a kind of baptism, equally as sacred. In fact, a lot more sacred than most people take baptism. Yes, and he's passing that potency through an emblem of potency. See, one emblem of potency, the king is an emblem of potency, is potency. And there is a passing on. It could well be a . But in this case, in terms of the particular purpose, see, in the particular purpose, it is the power of the mature man in terms of life and death, responsibility for life and death. And this whole thing that you see in gangs, for example, now, you know, in many of these street gangs, you're not an adult, see, until you have killed for the gang. That is a sort of vestige of this kind of intuition. It has to do with submitting to the power of life and death. But it is not a personal thing in the sense of an ego thing.

[01:15:16.860] 
For example, the idea of a soldier being in the military for a career is totally foreign to this. I'm going to go into this for a career and I'm going to get to be a general ooptie do. And that's a puer general because it's totally alienated from this. They talked about that with the civil war in the United States, technology changed so much that this whole old ancient knighthood kind of understanding of war got zapped with the revolution in muskets and all sorts of things like that. There was a big change right there and it really got consolidated with world war one and machine gun.

[01:16:15.520] 
Yes. There was no honor then. See a conflict between knights, you still got that sort of thing. There were still vestiges of that between some of the, for example, the Nazi, the air force and the Luftwaffe. There were a number of those old Prussian people that were part of the old Prussian families who still had some of those old Prussian knighthood traditions. And these pilots there were a lot of stories about these pilots, for example, not strafing the parachutes of flyers that they had downed, but the ones that were thoroughly modern.

[01:17:09.700] 
Thoroughly modern. Nazis, of course, had no hesitation to attack people that were defenseless. The old knighthood ideals would never use power against those that were defenseless, helpless and defenseless. And that's all that romance about the lady protecting the lady and all of that stuff is a part of this whole configuration that you got to get some sense for. The knighthood ideal is controlling one's own egoistic desires and drives the use of power, particularly the potential power of violence in the service of the realm and in service of the right order of the king. And so this whole thing about the sword being out, you have to understand it's out there. It is acknowledged there is a code that rules it. And nowhere do you see this more highly developed than in Japan in what is known as the way of the sword. Kindo. K-E-N-D-O or any of you specialist in kindo. There are a lot of kindo people here in Chicago.


The Warrior Within 04	[00:00:02.010] 
There, you know, in kindo, you it's a martial art, like the other martial arts, and you work your way up and become a black belt and this type of thing. And the whole thing is a whole, entirely comprehensive spirituality of the sword, very much like Zen, very much influenced by Zen. And and the whole idea about the Kindo master is that one becomes such a master of the sword that one dedicates himself to the sword. But the sword is dedicated to justice, and the sword is dedicated to the triumph over egoism. And for the kindo master, the greatest enemy is his own, what you and I would call narcissism, they say ego. That the sword. The first enemy of the sword is the ego. And there are many teaching stories, kindo teaching stories in which the and you see this played time and again in the movies. If you know what you're looking for, you see this same archetypal motif in the stories of the old gunfighter and the young gunfighter. But you see these kindo teaching stories in which the old kindo master is accosted by a river, by a young swordsman who wants to test his prowess with the old kindo master.

[00:01:55.110] 
And the old kindo master knows that he could kill him like this, but he gets in the boat with a young man, ostensibly to fight him, takes him across and leaves him on the other side that's the young man get out. He leaves him over there and goes on about his business. And see, in other words, the image is that an immature man would have been so worried about his pride that he would have had to kill the young man to keep from being ashamed. Oh, I've got to kill this young twerp. Whereas the mature kindo master would never fight. Somebody like that, if at all possible, would avoid it. And if he had to fight him, he would try not to kill him.

[00:03:00.010] 
Very much like the character who seemed to be a combination mages almost equal parts.

[00:03:10.690] 
Oh, yes. No question about it. Exactly. See, because in the maturation of the warrior, you got to have a lot of magus because the Magus has got to be there in order to read out these dynamics, to understand what's going on in the young man and what's going on in you and understand that this young man is waving his sword at you. Come on, big man. I'm going to show you. And the mature man chooses in fact, in terms of the lore of all this, very often the mature man chooses to love him, not to kill him.

[00:04:04.750] 
Yeah, I can't help but be reminded of Reagan's attack on Libya. And on that island, that little island there's kind of a big, bump bully in our playground. This would be, I think, a direct contradiction.

[00:04:33.590] 
Well, there are a lot of ways you can look at that. That's certainly one way. And I've heard that a lot. The other thing, though, is the Jimmy Carter version of being president. Slap me again, folks. That is to say, one of the important things to understand is that it's very important for a warrior to be clear that he does have power that there are situations in which he will use it. Because if there is nothing for which you will kill, then you're not a warrior. If there was nothing which you would not kill for, then you're not a warrior. So in other words, yes, it's true that not arbitrarily using force and certainly against the weak is important. By the same token, a police officer who is at a grade school playground and somebody comes in to start killing kids police officer wouldn't use lethal force in that situation is not a warrior. Yes.

[00:05:49.630] 
There'S nothing. What are they?

[00:05:57.730] 
Well, see, the pacifist will last thing. They want to be called a warrior. This is sort of the denial of this archetype is very deep in pacifism saying I don't have it. I don't want it. It has no positive purposes. If I could, I would breed it out of the human race by eugenics. It's very important to understand that in this archetype that there is power of life and death. See, not just life. There is power of life and death. There is the potential use of violence in this archetype. The question then is what and for what and in what situations would this power be used? It's the problem of every police officer. See, every police officer in fact, the place to look for the way in which this stuff works out in everyday life is in the life of a Chicago cop. And the king will always use violence to preserve order and justice and so forth in that archetypal motif. Arthur, for example, look at Arthur. In fact, one of Arthur's problems is that he hesitates too long. And for example, one of the things that you can think about one of the things I often think about is what would we have had in the United States with regard to crack if there had been more initiated males in our society?

[00:07:59.210] 
Would it be so easy for us to turn aside from the crack phenomenon what it's doing to children as we in fact do? Do you know what I'm talking about? Crack? Do you know what I'm talking about? About the epidemic of crack. It's very interesting to see the incredible impotence of our society in the face of something of scourge like this. Yes.

[00:08:31.490] 
Mentioned these young boys that he would pick up for various crimes and the police officer said not only do these young boys not have an initiated male in their life they don't even know what one is.

[00:08:49.640] 
No, they couldn't possibly. They have a fantasy that the dope dealer down the street is one because he kills people. Got all the goodies, got all the women and he's got all the money, and he's got all the guns, and that's where the power is. And so we create see, what you got to ask yourself about this is what you're doing when you create a society in which the young boys look at that and that's what they see. I mean, that is a problem, and it is related to this whole business. Anyway, let's move on. Now, let's see, we better take a short break. Let's take about ten minutes because we got a lot of stuff to cover. Okay? And then we'll lay out some of these positive potentials, and we'll do that together. Sure.

[00:09:51.870] 
How does killing the ego relate to.

[00:10:00.190] 
Yeah, see, when Eastern philosophers are Asian mystics or Buddhist, people influenced by Taoism or Buddhism are often some forms of Hinduism. When they talk about destroying the ego, they don't mean ego like psychoanalysis means ego. In fact, it's sort of the opposite. When they are talking about ego in Eastern philosophy, they're talking about narcissism. So when you destroy the ego in Eastern thought, you're becoming less narcissistic, less arrogant, see, less prideful in an immature way. And that is exactly what happens in psychoanalysis when you have a stronger ego. When you develop the ego self axis in psychoanalysis or in Jungian thought, you're becoming less narcissistic, less grandiose. So in other words, the terms are used radically differently. And so when he talks about killing the ego, slicing the ego into with a sword, that's the first stroke that is destroying the grandiosity. So it's just exactly the flip, just exactly the opposite. Anytime. You see, I'm editing a book right now entitled Self and Liberation, and it's a comparison of Buddhist thought. And it's got all these essays by Jung and prominent Buddhist thinkers dialoguing around the concept of the self and ego and that sort of thing.

[00:11:47.990] 
And it really turns on this question you ask the totally different views held by Buddhist and by Jungians, they're talking about the same thing. They're talking about the liberation of the self from pathological grandiosity. That's really where they are together, see?

[00:12:10.010] 
Yes, you were talking about the drug dealer on the corner. I was wondering about three other male images in black culture malcolm X and more with the idea of nothing willing to kill for. And what sort of Martin Luther King philosophy?

[00:12:39.730] 
Well, certainly willing to he was certainly willing to die for things. But see, the problem with Gandhi's Satya Graha, see, it works with British. It wouldn't have worked with the Southerners. It wasn't Martin Luther King, Satya Graha that did away with the kind of apartheid that existed in the southern United States. It was federal troops with bayonets. That's what did it. I marched with Martin Luther King and Montgomery Selma campaign. If it hadn't been for federal troops, we'd all been dead. All this nice Satya Graha stuff is fine as long as you're dealing with people that don't like to exploit force upon the bodies of the weak. But if you're dealing well, if they had it and they had not been corrupted by Nazism or they had not been corrupted by the military industrial complex like they were in Japan, but the people that got in control in Nazi Germany and Japan had no real allegiance to any knighthood ideals. They committed atrocities right and left. And the Japanese government to this day does not allow the Japanese people to know anything about the Japanese atrocities. Japanese schoolchildren to this day are not taught anything about the extent of the experimentation.

[00:14:31.030] 
We call that's all the Nazis did all this experimentation on humans. The Japanese did a lot of it too. So it is a now you raise the name of Malcolm X. That's another interesting person in this context because he was a person that would really embody a lot of the knighthood ideal and also in a mature way because it was very interesting after his trip to Mecca, he was able to slay the dragon of his racism. And it was because he was able to come back and say, allah is God of all that got him killed. But Malcolm X would have shot back if he had had a chance.

[00:15:34.170] 
One other masculine ideal came to mind that's quite common in that rock star. He has a violet symbol.

[00:15:45.630] 
He's the archetypal lover, basically. A lot of archetype of lover, a good bit of the magus, sort of. If you look at somebody like the Rolling Stones, they're a very heavy combination of archetypal lover and archetypal magus that is Jagger and the people conceiving the approach of the Stones had to understand a lot about ritual in order to really do a rock concert. You've got to be a master magician as well as being waving your wand and your phallus as well. But it's not the warrior. It's not the warrior stuff. But let me go through this white knight, red knight, black knight. You pick up this a lot of different knighthood traditions. It's very interesting. I just want to go into that now. And it's very interesting that it's in this order. And a lot of people say, what? You mean the black knight is the highest form of initiation? How can that possibly be? Well, you it has to do with the integration of the shadow. Because when you're the white knight, you're like Lancelot coming into the kingdom and saying, oh, I am the pure one, the purest of the pure am I?

[00:17:27.390] 
I would never do anything to harm my lord. And any king that had me as his knight would be so lucky because I am so devout and pure. And so he is the white knight. Yes, that's right. But you see, he was not one who would ever have any problem with sexual passion. He would not be anyone who would turn aside from his responsibilities because of passion or would let his passions overwhelm him anyway and cause him do anything wrong. And so this is your real young, uninitiated warrior who thinks he's pure. If you you this is your this is your South African white police lieutenant who is very incensed about these black terrorists that are bombing these white settlers and therefore feels justified in torturing these suspects to get the truth out of them so he can protect the innocent from these nasty black terrorists. That was portrayed recently in that what was the name of the film in South Africa about the cry freedom? But you see, I'm innocent, you see, and it's amazing. See, study torture. You got to study torture, the whole phenomenology of torture to get a sense for this because it's your white knight that is a torturer.

[00:19:18.680] 
Very often, he's the one who falls in love with the king's wife and he is so impressed with his romantic love for this king's wife. This is the thing about the immature male. When he all of a sudden he's in love with some woman and his love then takes precedence over everything else. There is nothing. It's holy. And this is where Robert Bly has come out. I was very interested. I hadn't talked with Robert Bly about this particular issue. But when Robert Bly is talking about no mature man will ever have an affair with another man's wife, this is what he's talking about. He is pointing to this particular aspect of the fidelity ideal of a mature man because the white knight, see, he is the innocent one. He would never do it anyway. This is your psychotherapist who brags that he would never have anything to do with any of his clients. I would never exploit my professional trust. Look out.

[00:21:09.460] 
What's the cause of savage?

[00:21:12.340] 
Well, it is that concern for purity. It is that concern to be unsullied. I mean, that is not a bad thing. I mean, it is a part of that sense of honor and it's a part of that sense of idealism that they talk about the puer having good side of the poor air being his idealism. Well, this is kind of what they're getting at. It's like, you know, you ought not to have to feel like a boy to wish that the cops were not corrupt. See, you shouldn't have to somehow feel less than a man because you don't like it that the cops are on the take. And that's the white knight. In a sense, yes.

[00:22:08.840] 
It's grounded in any kind of reality. It's not spirituality, purity that is really not pure.

[00:22:19.000] 
No, that's right. It's grandiosity, is what it is. You see, he's inflated, but he doesn't know it. You see,  it's the classic Jungian thing about not knowing your shadow. You don't really know. See, everybody else has got one, but not me. See, I am not vulnerable. See, there's the classic blind side. Once you get into this I am not vulnerable business. You've been had you've been had, then.

[00:22:48.840] 
Yes.

[00:22:54.440] 
It'S this bogus innocence. He's not innocent, but in his conscious mind, he's innocent. He just doesn't think he would ever be a problem to anybody.

[00:23:12.720] 
Who'S more.

[00:23:13.360] 
Sophisticated, well, it's because of who he is. This is a sense of calling. This is calling. You got to understand all this in the light of vocatio calling. I mean, if you're the right person, in this case, the right man, you're going to be able to do all kinds of things. But see, here we get see, the red knight in most of the traditions is an image of the person that has discovered passion. And I don't mean just sexual passion, although in the thing about Lancelot, it's presented as sexual passion, but it's passion. And in the context of most warrior functioning, you would say this is rage, red rage. And of course, this is the and you're still a little bit on the white side, see? Yes, I know. I took my knife stick and I beat you up. But you needed it so bad. You richly deserved it. In fact, if I'd have really given you what you deserved, I would have beat you a lot longer. And listen, there are a lot of cops that feel that way and do it well just to be righteous. You see. I mean, the police departments of our country are full of this kind of abuse.

[00:24:54.390] 
It's not just the Australian cops. If you're an Australian Aborigine, you have this uncontrollable urge to suicide when you're put in a prison in Australia. Did you know that? Have you read about that lately? There's just this compulsive urge to suicide. If you're an Australian Aborigine, they put you in a cell and all of a sudden you just have to strangle yourself. Must be hereditary. That the Australians are saying that they think that this must be a problem that comes from their religion and they've lost their religion and now they get into the cell and all of a sudden they have to have to die. They can't stand the loneliness. Yeah, the Australian Aborigines have male initiation, but a lot of the Australians don't. If you've ever been to Australia, all of the classic Crocodile Dundee, there's a lot of this pseudo macho stuff in that kind of culture. But they're they're killing a lot of these Australian Aborigines because they have the audacity to talk back. And it's very much the same type of thing in jails prisoner. You talk back, you get killed and you hang yourself in the cell. And that happens all over the world.

[00:26:25.310] 
And it is the whole thing about torture. Torturers are not bad folks, see, they're just punishing these bad folks. See, they're doing it in the name of right. And I just was overwhelmed by my righteous indignation toward you. And that's why I had to hook you up to that machine mentality. Yes, sir. They were knights. Those were Dominicanis dogs. Of the Lord hounds of heaven. We were trying to help you out with your soul, and I just had this passionate urge for your salvation, and there is no sense of the shadow there, you see, and what you get here. This is what happened a lot in Vietnam. Wow. They killed my buddy. And now we know where that fire came from, that village, and we're going to take out that village. And if you read the Vietnam literature and the accounts of what our soldiers did in Vietnam, you get a lot of red knight phenomena. And that is where you are passionate righteously about killing. Thoroughly. I mean, thoroughly. Yes.

[00:27:58.920] 
Now that you mentioned that.

[00:28:05.480] 
Become what.

[00:28:06.090] 
They call double wordings.

[00:28:13.680] 
Oh, yes. Oh, yes. See, it was very common in Vietnam, and a lot of it is related to what has happened in terms of the officer corps. You have that kind of business. You have no officer corps. What you've really got is a bunch of puers playing officers, and you had it all the way up. In terms of the generals, I blamed the officer corps for this kind of business because that could have stopped a lot of that stuff. A lot of it was very organized, very upfront. And not only did they just they didn't just shoot women. I mean, a lot of the time they they experimented with them, with their with their shovels, and and it was done all in righteousness, you know, because they were gooks that killed our buddies. So there is purity here and passion here, but it's still pure, and there's no shadow yet. See, you're running into the rage. This is where you get all these and this happens in relationships. You talk about where this comes out in relationships. You get a lot of red knight in relationships and female knight, too. A lot of people that feel like they are justified in enrageful behavior with their partner, and you try to get in there and try to intervene against this rage and, boy, this righteous indignation.

[00:29:53.100] 
What are you talking about? I have the right. I've got to stand up for I've got to stand up for me. And there is no sense about rage as a puer phenomenon, and there's no sense of the danger. But the difference between anger and rage see, anger is under ego controls. Rage is not under ego controls. And rage is what leads to domestic violence, and it's what leads to cops killing kids unnecessarily or people they're arresting. Yeah, right. And it is the person who has got the lethal force, the right to use lethal force, but they do not have the personality to be able to deal with it. And this is what all the police academy see, this stuff is what all the police academies have to teach, and they don't well, they try, but they don't do it well. Yes.

[00:31:43.750] 
One type of knight.

[00:31:53.050] 
That's right. And Duvall gets killed. But that's the point. See, a knight would rather die a million times than go against the code under which he is sworn to operate. I think that is a good film to look at for that. If you look at colors, you'll see that difference and you see it a lot. I don't know whether you've ever done any street work much, but there was a time when I was a community organizer in the city here and I was out on the street a good bit with people. And I came to really admire a lot of the Chicago's finest because I have seen them stay sane in situations where if they weren't really in this, they would have been shooting people. So you hear about the cases where the cops shoot people but you don't hear about the hundreds and thousands of cases where they absorb incredible abuse and they maintain their presence of mind. They use necessary force, not unnecessary force. It is oh, yes, precisely, precisely. But the tendency is for us to hear about the cases where it's abused.

[00:33:29.050] 
What would be the beneficial?

[00:33:33.850] 
Well, the important thing is passion. See, it's not necessary to be immature to have passion, contrary to what some people think. That's a different kind of image. Well, in that Arthurian thing, the red knight doesn't come out through violence. It comes out through the sexual passion. With Guinnevere. It's the same type of thing, though. It's where the passions overwhelm the capacity for commitment and for honor. The black knight, then, is very clearly the man who has dealt with the shadow. And he knows that he cannot take a position of righteous indignation and simplistic moral blaming and cannot run his functioning on that basis that it is not his own. In other words, it's not my personal honor that's really an issue here. It is a much wider code. And that the fact of whether somebody is saying shameful things to me. See, I've dealt with my own self. You see. The issue is I've dealt with myself. And because somebody says humiliating things to me, I don't have to shoot them. Whereas a person who has not dealt with their own narcissistic issues in the shadow they will not be able to stand being talked to in a ridiculing way.

[00:35:26.190] 
And that's, again, you're right about the Sean Penn character and the Sean Penn blows. But the black knight thing is an image of the integration of the shadow, the realization that, yeah, if I'd been in your shoes, kid, I probably would have done what you did too. That is to say, it's that thing about nothing human is alien to me. It'd be something like this. You have in you the capacity to be a mass murderer given the right set of conditions. And so don't get too self righteous about bundy. And, for example, those people that said, Gee, I'd love to pull the plug myself. Well, I understand that I understand that. However, it wouldn't be because I would not think that there would be conditions in which I could have done that. And the same thing is true in terms of all these situations with atrocities and all that sort of thing. Human beings are not to blame in some simplistic moral way. There are so many forces that are operating. But the question is, how do I exercise my power in this situation and for whom? And in this sword stuff, it is not for my personal ego, my personal narcissism.

[00:37:01.400] 
It is one's power is exercised under a code of commitment and for a wider good. That's sort of the knighthood ideal. Yes.

[00:37:16.450] 
Movement sort of balance also. But it all has to be balanced.

[00:37:25.990] 
What you get in the Black Knight is someone who is you might say that his magus has come much more online. That is, the Merlin, the inner Merlin now is very much with him and whispering in his ear and saying, there but by the grace of God, go you. So don't get so cocky about this. Just do your job. Yes, well, the person that can't get to this doesn't get any creative energies, but the person that gets to this is a better steward of them because we hear so much about the person whose creativity and his passion is so wonderful and so overwhelming that he just can't be responsible in any way. He's just the wonderful creative artist and it's just art flowing through him. And just his art is so powerful that it just causes us to overlook all of the rest of his personality. Well, this level would suggest that a man can be creative without being a sociopath. There's a lot of mythology about this. You got to be a sociopath if you're really creative. You got to have nothing that stands between you and your passion. Well, that's what this is about.

[00:39:07.260] 
So let's talk now a little bit now. We've got a few minutes left. Let's summarize some of these virtues and let's just list warrior virtues, put up as many as we can. This is fine. And let's just list them. Things which this archetypal configuration offers in potentia, which are not the shadow side. Let's leave the shadow side of it till next week.

[00:39:53.830] 
Loyalty.

[00:39:54.890] 
Loyalty.

[00:39:59.750] 
Fidelity.

[00:40:02.310] 
Yeah, and fidelity. And what was the last one? Commitment. To what? And I would say commitment not just to an end. Commitment to a transpersonal end cannot be commitment to your career if it's commitment to your career. That's not it. All this rap about professionalism back in the 19th century, when professionalism rose as a cultural form, it had this sense professionalism was not commitment to your career. Professionalism and careerism were not the same thing. It has become to the point that professionalism just means careerism today, but it wasn't that way at first. So it's transpersonal, I think, that it is experienced as sacred and may be for the person very sacred. It may be grounded in some transpersonal, maybe grounded some metaphysical value, religious value, spiritual value, but it cannot be just personal. That's the point. It cannot be just my ambition. Because if it's just my ambition, it's just self serving. See, in other words, by definition a mercenary is not a knight in that sense. Nothing wrong with it. It's just not a knighthood ideal. It's just not the warrior ideal. Well, I think it's important to serve oneself in many ways too.

[00:41:58.770] 
The lover does that a lot. See, the archetype of lover is really into enjoyment and it's not into doing. This is Action Jackson here. This is capacity to act. Now, next week we'll really get into what's the big deal about that? Well, fact is, people have a terrible time acting on anything. They'll study it, they'll ruminate about it, preferably obsess about it, all sorts of things. But in terms of acting, that's different. This is the archetype that allows you to act in George S. Patton's word attack. See, you don't dig any foxholes that's in Patton's. And that's a sort of a metaphor, of course. Always. See, you got to remember in terms of archetypal psychology, you don't want any of these things in their pure form. You get them in their pure form, you got a dangerous person without commitments to anything. Well, pure loyalty is what fanaticism ayotolo mini. I am twelve years old, I will go die for you on the fields of Iraq. This partisan zealotry, it's the Nazi party ideal. You're not very critical either. See, because if you don't have any megas, you don't think about this dude. You're committed to see, if you're a human being, you got to be able to decide whether you're going to be committed to them or not.

[00:44:05.260] 
Are you going to continue being a part of the British Empire? Are you going to have an American Revolution? I mean, it's a question of who's loyalty, who's going to be the one that you pledge your fealty to? And is there anything that person could do to say I unpledge my fealty?

[00:44:22.420] 
That's why it seems so important.

[00:44:26.740] 
And the lover and the magnet, it.

[00:44:28.210] 
Seems so important, the king archetype. And I'm wondering if it's weird. It's like I realized the war magnet lover in us is a king archetype in us. Or in actuality, like you talked last week, is it the sacred king? Is it the true order? Is it if you want to say.

[00:44:48.620] 
Our creator put the archetypes in it.

[00:44:50.800] 
That'S the theological question which you have to deal with yourself. Everybody has to deal. Just because you do the psychology doesn't mean that you finish the theology. You do the psychology. Then you got to deal with the metaphysical and theological question. And I'm not depreciating that. I'm just saying that in terms of the psyche, these things have got to be balanced. And you're absolutely right to point.

[00:45:13.880] 
It out.

[00:45:14.200] 
And remember this, always remember when you're dealing with any archetype, we'll talk next time. We'll really get into this a lot more about the way in which not enough presence of the king will manifest with this. Not enough presence of the lover will manifest with this. Not enough presence of the Magus will manifest in certain ways. Okay, but what else? See, to act, to organize, to plan, to resource. Sorry about that. One of the things when the warrior archetype really goes mad and it's not regulated, you've got all of your tank divisions out here strung out and you run out of gas there. You've got all your tanks sitting along on the plane, no gasoline. Now I want you to think about that as an image for things that happen in your life. Does that ever happen to you when you've been too much in the warrior and you hadn't bothered to check the gas gauge.

[00:46:40.480] 
Which would be a punch, right?

[00:46:43.090] 
Checking the gauge. Well, a warrior always improvised. See that's an obsessive compulsive. I mean, you know, one of the things that happens is another thing it does. Look at this one. Anesthesia anesthesia, it knocks out the pain. You don't feel it. This archetype doesn't feel pain too much. It's one of the most dangerous things about it.

[00:47:26.890] 
Allow that.

[00:47:30.330] 
Not when you are really in it.

[00:47:34.970] 
Doesn't the worry you need to acknowledge.

[00:47:37.190] 
Right, as a human. See, but when you get in trouble with this thing, we'll see the next week, talk about the compulsive when you get in trouble with this thing. Whereas if you're in some other archetype you may feel tired when you're tired but if you're in this one you won't feel that tired.

[00:47:58.770] 
Real clearly about distinguishing between the wounds that men carry acknowledges as it's wound the macho type that doesn't acknowledge that's right. And takes that wounded and inflicts it on another person.

[00:48:13.050] 
That's right. But you see what you got to see is what you got to see is the way in which that's built into this archetype to not feeling the pain, the wound that Bly talks about warriors not going to pay attention to that. When you're really into that warrior archetype, when you're possessed by it, you can be shot all pieces and not feel it.

[00:48:36.350] 
What is the archetype that does acknowledge the wound?

[00:48:39.050] 
Well, the Magus is going to know it, the lover is sure going to know it. But see, this thing doesn't exist to make you aware of your wounds. This thing exists to help you inflict wounds on the enemy. And so another thing then we've got to stop here in a minute. But look at this on this one, finding the enemy discrimination. Yeah, well that's discrimination which is very closely related sansa you can look at a lot of problems which we'll get into next week. A lot of problems in personality exist because a person is not aware there's an enemy. I mean there are a lot of things that are real enemies and the person not aware of it and that's.

[00:49:48.160] 
The source of denial.

[00:49:49.370] 
That's denial. Yeah. And so it's this warrior archetype. It's going to make you vigilant, see. And so want to think about now the relationship between this archetype and paranoia see. So next week we'll talk about how it's working in paranoia, see. Because all you got in paranoia is this thing working. It's just doing its thing with not enough discrimination. Remember the archetype always will have an.

[00:50:28.390] 
Enemy.

[00:50:32.130] 
If not it'll invent one. But the thing about it is human beings always have an enemy. The problem with humans is though they keep thinking it's other humans. We'll stop there.

[00:50:53.530] 
Next week we will talk about healing the warrior within and culture and methods. We started out by talking about the archetype that is manifest in cultural materials.

[00:51:16.600] 
Religion and folklore.

[00:51:20.530] 
Talks about the archetype. That potential is supposed to be expressed in creativity and leadership. And tonight going to focus in a lot pathology at this archetype and the pathological forms which we see it expressed both socially and personally. Now any one of you after some reflection could do amazing commentary on this. So we won't finish anything tonight. We'll get some saving points. Let me just rehearse for a moment assumptions, the assumptions of a Jungian psychology of the archetypes in relationship to the ego air Mike's mind. As I've said, it's very important to maintain a constitutional jungian psychology to keep in mind and keep it clear that archetypes are real. They're not just a figment of somebody's imagination. Contrary to what some so called archetype psychologists will tell you. These are deep structures of the human psyche. They operate very much like noam chomsky's ideas of deep linguistic structures. They make up a human grammar in the psyche. We are still very tentative understanding these things. We are not very far advanced but to be aware of these patterns and configurations as they exist at all in some projects and to gain more sophisticated understanding about what must be done with archetypes is very important to the human race.

[00:53:32.070] 
We are very primitive still on this, extremely primitive. But in short the idea is that the first thing you got to do is understand that the unconscious mind of the human race is structured. No matter what anybody wants to tell you about that it is structured. All you have to do is to study history and watch it. Look around you a little bit and you'll see the recurrent patterns. And this shouldn't be surprising anybody that knows anything about instinctual behavior animals. Because we are animals and we are wired in a way that is parallel to some animal wiring. And we come with this hardware and we're going to be stuck with it, period. Until some idiot who is possessed by the magus archetype, which there are many in their major universities and research centers, decide they're going to improve on it and they're going to breed out of existence this warrior archetype. And there are going to be lots of people coming along very soon that are going to Mr. Rogers in the future of the Earth. They're going to fix the human race by getting rid of this archetype. But until that happens, we've got it in the hardware.

[00:55:16.030] 
And the question is, what are we going to do with it? How are we going to use it? Is it going to be accessed in any way that maximizes the creativity of potential? Are we going to be nice and argue that it doesn't exist, it's only socialization and whatever, and that therefore we won't let kids play with soldiers and we won't let them, buy toy guns. That's going to somehow fix things. The issue, according to a centrist Jungian point of view with regard to psychology of this, is that you must develop a conscious relationship to all of the archetypes unless you're going to be acting out in a destructive way. In a way that's destructive. I almost wanted to say in active or passive ways. But to be more accurate, it's always active and passive ways. You'll see, tonight you will notice when you think about yourself under the guise of this that you act out in active and passive ways. You may major in one more than the other, but it's usually both. So the goal is to develop a conscious relationship. When you do not develop a conscious relationship to this and when the ego of the personality, as in ego psychology uses that not Eastern philosophy.

[00:56:52.340] 
Remember we were talking in one of the previous sessions that when Eastern philosophy talks about doing away with the ego, they are not talking about the ego of psychoanalytic theory, they're talking about narcissism, they're talking about pathological grandiose. The ego of Asian philosophy is more synonymous not with the ego of psychoanalysis. It is synonymous with the psychoanalytic concept of pathological grandiosity. So the goal is to form a conscious relationship with this embody as much as possible of these archetype of energies in a conscious way, in a way in which you can assume responsibility. And the big word stewardship. Stewardship is a key concept, even though nobody talks about these things. And when somebody like the president, when he is inaugurated uses the word stewardship. All the press can do is to find some way to trivialize that concept by relating it back to his prep school days. As if the only people that would understand or use the concept of stewardship is some preppy instructor. But there is no word that's more important in this context of archetype of psychology stewardship of these energies. Okay, now I'm going to ask you to be thinking about what you want to put up on the board.

[00:58:35.460] 
I'm going to put up a few things and then I want you to help me list manifestations of this in social and personal pathology. And then I want to go into you a little more deeply in terms of the dynamics coming the way this works so that you'll have a sense for the way that expresses various personal syndrome. Remember, if the archetypal pattern you're pretty unconscious about it, you will do one, both, one of the other, or both identify with it's or you will project it and assume a masochistic attitude for it.

[00:59:44.550] 
Thereby submitting in a crazy way to the numinosity and divinity that you ought to submit to in a conscious way. Would you run that by me again? Yes, please. One of the big expressions of the pathology of the warrior is masochism. In masochism you submit to the warrior compulsive, thereby doing something that you ought to choose to do consciously. Remember, this is not the human warrior. We're talking archetype. We're not talking humans. We're talking about archetypal, numinous reality, the appropriate attitude, or which is reverence respect and an engagement based on that. In that respect, yes.

[01:00:56.410] 
For some reason this seems very abstract. It's as if you're saying this exists within everybody or in certain people.

[01:01:04.190] 
Have you been here in previous sessions? No. Okay. It would seem abstract. You can get the tapes. You can get the tapes in which all that's laid out, it is the view of the Jungian School is that this is in your wiring whether you know it or not or whether you like it or not.

[01:01:27.590] 
The question was everyone's or certain people.

[01:01:30.180] 
Everyone'S male and female now. And of course, you will see here that if you identify with it you were going to ask me, weren't you? Okay, well, where's the sadistic mode of this masochism, Bob? Well, of course, if you're possessed by it, identify with it, you will be sadistic. So one of our jobs tonight.

[01:02:08.770] 
Is.

[01:02:09.240] 
To look at sadomasochism as a social and personal phenomenon. So let's look at this. Of course, the obvious, most obvious example in this phenomenon exists in the context of human warfare. This is the one these people so emphasize the. If you study human history. You'll notice that human beings don't like peace. They make war a lot. There are only a very few times in the history of human race when it has not been at some kind of war and usually in some pretty enthusiastic war and sometimes in total wars. And this led of course, people like Douglass McArthur to talk about those times in human experience when the quote war tocsins sound. By that he's talking about something that like the Greek old Roman world said, mars possesses you. Whenever Mars comes in there the god Mars comes in there and takes you over possesses you. And then your teeth get set on edge, your trigger finger gets itchy and you want to put on your blogner list now flying the ball crease.

[01:04:18.810] 
Take.

[01:04:19.150] 
The safety take the safety off of the rockets. Get the napalm bombs ready. Let's go kill some goose. It kick some ass and kill some goose. We will break them later. And this is something that ancient tradition, human race, basic village after winning. And it is so ubiquitous in human history that it's amazing how little study it's gotten. I mean, you would think as much money as it is cost as many lives as it's cost that it would get studied a lot more. But it's very interesting and it's not really given the size of the phenomenon has not attracted all that much study. And now it's getting some more and you get people working on this campaign, but it is very interesting. It's almost like human beings didn't want to figure this out. They're always coming up with rationalizations. We always wonder if it's rationalizing our archetype of behaviors, what war is a just war, all of them that you won when you were the victor and you won it. But in any case, that sense that periodically human beings, they discover the enemy. Enemy. Remember we talked about the archetypal enemy and the name of that book that I don't know what I mentioned to you I meant to about the enemy is the book Princeton University Press, the Old Enemy, and I meant to mention that to you is a wonderful treatment of the enemy.

[01:06:49.050] 
You can also look at Sam Keen's much lesser treatment, Faces of the Enemy. It's still a nice but you discover the enemy and you mobilized and depending on particular situation, mobilize. And then you're into it in the thick and once you get into it in the thick, sadistic behavior seem justified. And if you look closely at behaviors, I mean, if you study the history of war and you study the history of battles and so forth, you will notice that when war atrocities are committed by both sides and Geneva Conventions are not followed. I mean, you talk to GI combat troops from Second World War when we were supposed to be such Sir Galahads and you will notice that it was very common practice in the European theater, not just the Asian theatre not take prisoners. You you had a lot of units that were very well known for not taking prisoners. I mean, so so this thing about us being the ones that not doing any atrocities and them being the ones that do the atrocities is really inaccurate historical research.

[01:08:43.740] 
Yet how do we shift it so that I take it when you say discover the enemy or name the enemy, they're both adopting really bad that at that point we're not identifying with rejection.

[01:08:59.130] 
But you have said that the reaction to projection is massacre. We should blow an Avon on our cells when we see gate off instead of a lot of people do that.

[01:09:09.290] 
There are a lot of folks that get into the masochistic position on this that if they had their way, they would shut down all police departments because one of those cops might use deadly force against somebody. And that is masochistic as hell l you don't do where I live, where I have good understanding.

[01:09:39.020] 
But would you say that discovering the enemy or whatever the phrase you use is the projection of time?

[01:09:45.680] 
Not always. The point that you've got to get to last week, you should have gotten it. The point that you want to get to is that there are real enemies of the human race. And one of the things that is a pathology of this archetype, which we'll talk about is the inability to recognize the enemy when the enemy is there. When your warrior archetype is not functioning well on your behalf, and you're going around like Pollyanna thinking that everything is safe and hunkydory and you have got an intruder in the system.

[01:10:21.710] 
This is the way cancer works. This is the way AIDS works. It works on the physical level as well as on the social level as well as on the intra psychic level of individuals. So the point is that when this thing is operating well and you're accessing it in a constructive way, it will help you recognize real enemies. But the problem is it operates so quickly. And when the ego of an individual is very weak and undeveloped then it's like you click in a system and all of a sudden it takes off on its own and it goes a lot further than you told it to go. You operate with computers, and you don't know what I mean. What is this? What you told it to? Something you didn't know you told it to? But in any case, you get the example when it locks in and human warfare. I mean, just study European history. Just study European history. Get all these cousins, all these folks that are interrelated and incredibly complicated intrigues about how they're going to these paranoid fantasies about each other and then how they're going to kill each other. Spain is going to do this.

[01:12:04.420] 
England is going to do that. France is going to do that. I mean, they're just it's just an incredible sort of tale. And that's why people don't study that stuff. Most people don't study any history anymore. And that's one of the reasons because it's so unbelievable. Somebody's right. This is fiction, right? This should never get packaged. But the more history you study, the more you're aware of the way this thing operates unconsciously. And once it gets invoked and there's not a lot of sophistication the thing just comes in, sets up, takes over, and every the whole reality is restructured. When you make a warrior or you make a war society, when you put a society on a war footing it is a radically, totally different thing. Different cosmos is experienced by the people that are in it. That's what the word mobilization means mobilize. You're trying to constellate as much as possible and all the propaganda machines go into function and of course, depending on your viewpoint, it's a propaganda machine or it's an attempt to get the people mobilized against the enemy. And that is always in any particular situation. Certainly if you study the recent American history in the last two centuries, including civil War, First World War, and Second World War, you see how this process works and the thing gets into gear and starts rolling, and it has its own momentum.

[01:13:58.410] 
That's one of the most important things to understand about this. Once it's constellated, it has its own momentum that bears no relationship to anything real necessary. No necessary relationship to anything real. It's like the way in which the Nazis cranked up their sadistic machine to kill all of the Jews, and they got that thing set up and they put their best minds to work on it and the Final Solution and set it in process. Like good warriors, they looked at planning and strategy and resourcing and body counts. They were the masters of body count. And they said this thing you need to watch show up, get the movie, show up on video and watch that, and it will give you a chilling treatment of the warrior going mad. The warrior just completely gone. Very similar thing you see right now in Israel where the Nazi shadow's coming out, which there is a lot of Israeli soldiers going to their commanders and they're saying, this is not what soldiers are for. Now, that's very in the context of our class. It's a very interesting phenomenon to watch. Israeli soldiers, the best in the world, they're going to their commanders and they're saying, this is not what I was trained about.

[01:15:55.290] 
And what you see lying back in there is what we've been talking about in this course. Those soldiers, a lot of those soldiers are aware of this inner knighthood ideal. Knights don't go around shooting 14 year olds unless they absolutely have to protect life and them. But it's the same thing. And what we don't understand is this thing is in the psyche of the Nazis. It's in the psyche of the Israelis. That's got to get clear to those for whom this is not clear. They're sleepwalking. And it has to have the same treatment whereever it manifests itself. So the important thing to get human warfare, it gets going. The question of just war is always a question in philosophical circles. Is there any such thing? And that is a question about which there is enormous disagreement. A lot of people will say, well, in the context of the weapons we have now, nuclear weapons, et cetera, there's got to be unilateral disarmament, blah, blah. There are good arguments on those lines back and forth. But the point of it is that from the point of view of the archetype, all words just from the point of view of the archetype, because it's like that big, white, shark in Jaws.

[01:17:36.810] 
It doesn't give a damn what it is. It's a killing machine, and it's a magic killing machine, and it's an honorable killing machine, and it doesn't want to have any interrogation by humans. Do you get it? This thing doesn't want any questions asked about it by humans. And when it gets turned loose, it loves what it's doing. And that's what makes it so hard to counteract or stop and remember the virtues of the knight. Well, he's always righteous. If he ever engages in some act with violence that's not righteous, he's not really a knight. So what's scary is when you get into this, I am a knight what I do is knightly, whatever I do is knightly. And if you don't think I'm a knight, you just insulted my honour.


The Warrior Within 05	[00:00:02.730] - Robert Moore
This is a grand old southern tradition. Now, I may hate your guts, but I will be polite to you and I will never show it to you until you dishonor me. And then I will kill you. But I will kill you politely. Pickup truck. I'll kill you politely because if you act in some other way that doesn't understand the code of honor, which is this is just a traditional order, the code of honor is that if you are dishonorable, you've already self destructed and everybody dies. So I don't have to kill you then. But it's that assumption that look at how the archetype of inflation operates. I am a gentleman. Red knight. What I do is knightly. If you raise a question about it, you are sullying my honor. Honor is a nightly word. If you sully my honor, then I am privileged to kill you. Because you are not only besmirching me, you're not besmirching Robert, you're besmirching sir and everything that that includes it is said that when McCarthur came in Manila on his return, he was incredibly upset about all of the atrocities that the Japanese soldiers had committed on civilians before they were defeated.

[00:02:06.170] - Robert Moore
He was so incredibly insulted about the way in which this had besmirched the reputation of soldiers. Do you get it? Think about that. And one of the reasons why he wanted so badly to see their commander of that garrison hanged is because of that. He wanted to kill him, not because he had killed so many of his soldiers that his troops had killed so many of his soldiers. That's fine. That's what you're for. Your soldiers killed my soldiers. And whoever is best wins. But when you start using this power on civilians, you have dishonored me. And not only that, you have dishonored your colleagues. That's worse. See that? And so the danger here, as you can see in the social field and you can think about all the applications, all these folks running around in their knight, thinking their non guilty because they are by definition righteous. See, when you're in the archetype, you are by definition righteous. And you do not have to think about anything. And you sure do not want to give any of your opponents the benefit of thinking about what they're saying to you. That's just propaganda.

[00:03:55.610] - Speaker 2
Could you distinguish I have this idea of toxic honor that you've been describing, but that there's also a healthy honor. What's the difference?

[00:04:08.560] - Robert Moore
Or how do they how does one change?

[00:04:11.760] - Robert Moore
See, don't you see the narcissistic pathology in that form that is to my mind, in my inflation? I think you're insulting all men. When you insult me, you didn't mean to insult all men. You just meant insult me. And so in order for me to be able to get past my guilt and I noticed the way this thing operates to get past the inhibition of your true guilt, that is to say, as long as I'm inflated and I'm in this archetype, I don't feel any guilt. I'm doing what must be done. I am doing my duty. That's what the Nazi worker.

[00:05:00.170] - Robert Moore
Themselves say, doing my duty to the Nazi state, to the like, see? And you see, there's the narcissistic pathology, but I don't feel it that way. And that's what you got to get clear about, about psychopathology. People that are crazy don't know it for the most part, and they don't feel it. And they feel like they're doing everybody a favor. That guy who killed all those children out there in Stockton, he was a warrior taking on the enemies of, I think, probably white American culture against all these immigrants, especially those Asian immigrants. Kill all these American boys and here they're coming to Stockton and what they fail to do, I will take care of.

[00:05:58.530] - Speaker 2
If you don't think this question will lead us to anything if you don't think this question leads I'm having some trouble understanding how this relates to paranoia.

[00:06:15.510] - Robert Moore
Well, anybody got a clue how this would relate to paranoia? Let's just do that now because that would be a term you'd put right here in the middle, wouldn't it? Way in which you would participate in this one. So we'll put paranoia in here. Okay. Paranoia can be like the character of all the projection.

[00:06:45.190] - Speaker 2
And it's perfect justification for sadistic action.

[00:06:51.730] - Robert Moore
Sure is. But I would know the sadistic i, personally is not doing the sadistic action. It's all justice because it's just by the fact that you're out getting it.

[00:07:08.490] - Robert Moore
See, paranoia is just a fancy term to talking about vigilance. Now, if you're not inflated, then it's just your healthy warrior making sure you notice when you're a woman walking home at night that somebody just crossed the street and started walking behind you. That's your warrior archetype doing its job. It just did its reconnaissance and it noticed that there is a bogey back there and it has got you alert to taking evasive actions or a number of things you might do. But in paranoia, this thing is turned up a Rio estate on it. You get that reasset turned up to where it starts seeing flights and planes when there aren't any and it just starts scanning for enemies. And everywhere anything moves, there's an enemy. You get a paranoid personality. They're an armed camp, and they're able to be so provocative that they're right because you get a paranoid personality. One of the things about paranoid personalities you don't like me, do you?

[00:09:00.510] - Robert Moore
I'm considering I'm not. And, you know, after a little bit of that this is when the therapist refers. Is Joe McCarthy an example of this? I think so. There's always this type of personality, this vigilance, always seeing people on the inside, as always find the fifth column. And you if you're a therapist, you notice that when this stuff is coming up in therapy you notice that first thing does make you into the end. Because, see, notice this. If you're in therapy and your therapist is getting any kind of positive transference from you that means trust. And of course, if you weren't, you wouldn't be going to the therapist if you didn't think they had more power in some ways than you did. And so power and trust. Trustworthiness power, that is something this thing doesn't like when it's in a you know, it doesn't want to see that because everybody's in on it, nobody can be trusted by definition when this thing is really roaring. And so when the person's in this archetype, they will have to see if they can't destroy the therapist as a good object or good relationship. This is what happens usually in therapeutic relationships.

[00:11:01.570] - Robert Moore
And a therapist that doesn't understand what's happening with this warrior business will probably not be able to deal with it because they get their feelings hurt. One thing you got to know when you're dealing with this archetype is you better not be having your feelings hurt, because if you don't know enough to button up when this thing is around, then you ought to not try to deal with it. And one of the things we ought to talk about tonight is in relationships. This thing runs around crazy in a lot of personal relationships between men and women. And one or the other of the couple often does not know enough to button up. When this thing raises its head. Here she comes again, Athena with her sword in her armor. And the man will often say, gosh, I displeased her again. What did I do? What did I do? What did I do?

[00:12:16.010] - Speaker 2
No, he doesn't do that. He takes it himself.

[00:12:19.840] - Robert Moore
Well, that's the one variation. We can all do the variations on the theme, but a lot of the women that I've seen in my short experience of life don't need any help from you, the helpful son.

[00:12:41.170] - Robert Moore
I mean, a lot of men are very helpful sons. But, you know, the thing that men need to understand, if they understood. And if I had a chance to teach some work with some battered men, the first thing I would do was about a bunch of battered men battered men. As I would tell them, son, you need to learn to button up. When you see somebody walking in that door with a sword in their hand, you don't just come in like this because, you see, notice what's happening? This is what's happening. It's always an arrangement. Hurt me again, honey. So hurt me again so that I don't have an excuse to leave you because I never trusted you in the first place. So when you get into these relationship dynamics, contrary to what a lot of people will tell you, you need to teach people to be less vulnerable in relationships. All this stuff about being more vulnerable, that's the biggest croc that was ever perpetrated on the public in the name of therapy. Somebody coming at you like this, the appropriate response is to button up. You don't have to shoot them. Just button up.

[00:14:08.510] - Robert Moore
Okay, so this paranoia thing, remember this all comes up as a piece. It all rises at once and the paranoid possibility is always there when this thing is constellated. And it would probably be safe to say that in all cases there is some paranoia. A lot of the time it is involved in an overvaluation of the potential power of the enemy. We do that a lot. I'm appreciative of realistic defense estimates and so forth.

[00:15:01.320] - Speaker 2
But in my observation that being somewhat yielded paranoid or something like that they have a great analyst.

[00:15:25.690] - Robert Moore
Well they're able to deal with transference better than a lot of others because in order to be aware of transference don't own you from other people. You have to scan, you have to be at the scanners run. You need to know when you're being attacked. There are a lot of people who're very frustrating patients because you come in, you're mad with your therapist, you know, and you attack them and they don't notice. How does that make you feel when you attack the therapist and therapist doesn't notice it? Does that make you feel good? No money. So again paranoid is just a word for something that has to do with vigilance.

[00:16:27.950] - Robert Moore
And in interpersonal relationships it's very smart to have the radar on because if you don't there are going to be a lot of things you miss. And it's not smart to miss a lot of signals in interpersonal relationships because typically things get escalated when one or the other misses the signals. You say, well this person, something's going on. They didn't even notice. I'm trying to do something to get their attention. They don't notice. So that's a big factor. And remember, it's only paranoia when the archetypal configuration is out of control. Otherwise that's just being waste.Yes.

[00:17:21.620] - Speaker 2
Reading Andrew Schmuckler's book called out of Weakness I know the book but I haven't had a chance to read it yet. What does he have to say about a couple of chapters in? He's been pretty rough on warriors and that was kind of annoying to me. But what you're saying here is that a lot of the manifestation of the warrior is coming out of some kind of pathology or weakness which is why we see such downside negative results whenever the warrior is affected.

[00:17:54.970] - Robert Moore
The problem with archetypes is the thing. It's like in order for an archetype to manifest appropriately there has to be an ego.

[00:18:09.870] - Robert Moore
It has to have a dialogue partner that has some firmness and it also has to have a dialogue partner. Therefore the mature ego who has got a mature magus and a mature lover and a mature king who it can consult with. And barring those things which you look at the history of human history there's no accidents. This thing look, this thing is just this huge killing machine and we just kind of stumble into it and we do our thing and act out for two years until we wake up and then we do something else. Like, it's amazing. Americans don't like to think about history at all. And you can see why. Here they devastate Japan and Germany, right? And then they get into their Marshall Plan and they rebuild them. And then the war continues, and Americans wondering what happened. They have not got this figured out yet. But in any case, just remember, keep in mind the thing comes in if there are no mature personalities around. It just runs amok it just goes cutting through human history and groups. Willy nilly and it's you got to get some sense for the power of the archetypal.

[00:19:59.800] - Robert Moore
It organizes things just like a magnet organizes iron filings. It's not waiting around for somebody to say yes.

[00:20:07.540] - Speaker 2
You can organize it around chaos. Right? Like organize. Yes.

[00:20:14.070] - Robert Moore
Well, chaos results when this thing has no restraints. Put yourself in the situation of a German general late in the war, Second World War, and you're not stupid. You can see what is happening in Russia. You can see what's happening on all these fronts. You've read the figures on the U-boats, and you're trying to have some sort of rational national policy. Look, sir, we have lost. There are a lot of women and children in Berlin, and we have sued for peace now. And there's no listening to this. There is only the rage. Fight for the last man. Don't come back alive. Honor. Honor the right idea. Honor the right last.

[00:21:31.070] - Robert Moore
Sort of the same warlike tendency then flipped from, say, let's all go die. Let's all fight the last million. Well, that wasn't in the general. This thing about fighting to the last man is not thing as it is a matter of dishonor that goes with this archetype. Duty, honor, country. Remember, duty, honor, country.

[00:22:05.460] - Robert Moore
That gets us into the problem with Stanley social pathology. Men the problem about the way in which this archetype, by virtue of the necessary enemy, must divide human beings as long as it's unconscious. As long as human beings have not achieved psychological reflection, it must divide them. Because it starts out with tribe and then you get the nation or class warfare try to get to that place. But the actualities of it is you never get beyond the psychology of tribalism. Nationalism is just a psychology. Tribalism racism is a form of this. Anti Semitism is a form of it. As long as you can get an enemy that you can use in order to feel the energy of the archetype get it? Think about this. The point is, you're a human. You need to feel the energy of this archetype. How am I going to feel the energy of this architype? Well, I've got to have an enemy. If I don't have it, I don't feel this. And therefore I do not have all those good feelings to go with it. Yes.

[00:23:50.270] - Speaker 2
Joseph Campbell, for example, said that at this time we need to move away from tribalism nationalism. And go towards a universal that is a global mythology, which personally I have great difficulty with. But what then would have to happen in terms of the enemy archetype? Would we have to say we are anti Martian or something like that?

[00:24:16.920] - Robert Moore
That'd be one way to go. That's what Sci-fi does. If you notice the way Sci-Fi operates, it operates that way, and that is an attempt to struggle with that, to put the enemy in outer space. I do it just the opposite. I put the enemy in inner space because in terms of my psychology that I work on a lot now, in terms of the archetypal shadow, I put the enemy inside, but I put it in all humans. And it is not an archetype of shadow in my own work. It is not human. And so it has some of the virtues of a space virus or Andromeda Strain or The Thing. But I think that's the solution, personally. I think humans have to understand that there is an inner enemy and that he or it or she or they would like to have it all blow. I'll talk about that more, of course. I teach four sessions next door. But that's the way I look at that. Because unless you do that, it has to be projected. And once it has to be projected, there must be a human enemy. And if it isn't the gooks or the blacks or the Jews, or the Goy or Honkies, or men or women, then it's just you.

[00:26:19.430] - Speaker 2
I don't understand exactly where the metaphysical no, I can see all this playing itself out. All right?

[00:26:27.580] - Robert Moore
The masochism comes in when you become nice.

[00:26:33.310] - Speaker 2
Under what circumstances do you become nice?

[00:26:36.300] - Robert Moore
Well, I don't know what you may have said. You're nice. Why would one become nice? Because mom told you to be nice, or dad told you to be nice, or Church told you to be nice, or you grew up a brethren, right? How is this a reflection of that boy or archetype? Well, how is this reflection? You grew up in a Paxist family, therefore you projected. You don't have it in you, right? No, but I'm oppressed it's not in me.

[00:27:20.110] - Robert Moore
God said, the warrior is not in me. God said, Turn the other cheek and I'm for the witness here and my people turn the other cheek and there is not a killer. I am a Quaker. I am a friend. Don't you believe me? See? And this is the way it's been done historically. You become either a nonviolent person who's not going to perpetrate any violence or you become a compulsively weak person and you totally declare bankruptcy. You are not responsible for any of the acting out that any of these sadistic bastards do.

[00:28:22.030] - Robert Moore
You are not responsible for what the criminals do. You're not responsible for what the rapists do. You're not responsible for what the persons with the power in doing the atrocities or the torture do you're not responsible for any of that because you are being good. It's a very classic tactic. Yes.

[00:28:46.250] - Speaker 2
In that context then if we look at Martin Luther King who certainly was talking about nonviolence but yes but everything that King did was a certain type of warfare. Oh he was a general, and he probably admitted that. So but you see if if that's that clear then that's a different kind of thing see because that is manifesting that's manifesting this thing and really being aware that you're making war and he was aware of that. But the masochistic thing you have to talk about this as where you deny this in your conscious ego but since it is a part of you in a sense a self object fusion time you can't get rid of it. This is a part of you then you will not lose it. It's just like for example those of us that are very wounded in our childhood like to work with wounded children, become child analyst, child psychologist in the same paper always searches it's always the me search and the research.

[00:30:15.830] - Robert Moore
That's not my term. That's lee roll off there it is for you lee me search and research. But by the same token the everybody's always said mask is made face and that's right. But you got to understand this archetype to understand why. Understand why? Because this thing is in you and you do admire it and the more unconscious it is, the more compulsively you admire it. Got to get a sense for compulsion. There's a lot of compulsive fatal masochistic behavior around and there is a lot of numinosity that is experienced when being beaten or urinated upon or any number of sadistic practices that are looked at as sexual activities. Numinosity, that's a sense of magic, sense of the magical power. It's almost. God. Archetype. If you look at Rudolph Otto's book highly are the idea of the holy. He is the one whom we trace all that the numinus is that experience of the divine manifestation of the sacred that which is fully real, fully alive, loaded with energy. It makes me feel real and alive and makes me high. You get a high from it. Do you have a sense I use magic with a little pejorative of trickery.

[00:32:17.620] - Robert Moore
Is that what you're meaning when you're saying no,

[00:32:21.550] - Robert Moore
I'm using it more in the sense of the human experience of the numinous as being something esoteric something that is precious and hidden until it manifests itself or someone manifests it transporting. Well it is well it's like you feel about the person that you're in love with when you're first really in love with them. It's that enchanment listen but it's more of a compulsive thing. I mean when you really get a sense for the numinousenchantment and you got to work on that because you'll never have a sense for archetypes unless you have a sense for this. They are all enticing and attractive. It's the attraction of cocaine. It is the way you feel when you're really blasted on cocaine. Everything is crisp and sharp and bright, and it's that sense of it's what we traditionally in psychology called manic phase. How you feel when you're in a manic phase loaded with energy, power. So that's what you got to remember about these things. And when it comes on and there's no ego structure there, it comes in and everything becomes alive. And the little toy soldiers march, the bands play, and there's lots of beautiful uniforms and beautiful women and men, and they're all out parading, and there's lots of sex where you go, you drink a lot of good whiskey, everybody's partying.

[00:34:29.310] - Robert Moore
If they go off to Gallipoli, everybody's alive. And the thing about studying the war, you got why men love war and men love war. Get a sense of all these Veterans of Foreign Wars post, all these old guys that get together with their hands on the most alive they ever were. And a lot of this post traumatic stress syndrome that we talk a lot about, about Vietnam, people we like to moralize about this. But part of what is is that they were alive then and they're not now, and they had a sense of passion. Passion. This thing is passionate. I mean, you believe in something you're not for God's sake, you're not depressed when you're in there.

[00:35:32.140] - Speaker 2
So the woman that does the man in following the woman as is the man who accepts it.

[00:35:39.610] - Speaker 2
Well, in terms of relationships, we want to get into that more after the break. But you take a bored, depressed couple, most of them, and they're wondering where the gusto went. Well, none of the archetypes are really getting honored in this. And so in that situation, you can bet archetypes are going to manifest. Won't be long either.

[00:36:27.210] - Robert Moore
And you can think about how different ones manifest in that. But if you want to feel alive, have you ever noticed how much couples fight in order to feel alive? And that thumbs happening relationships. And then they make love because they broke through the shelf and broke through the ordinariness it settles in all that sedimentation, I call it. Everything just settles out. When this form of numinosity or that powerful energy comes in, it will organize everything about there will be an enemy. Whoever's in the neighborhood will be the enemy. Just like when that thing comes into the world, whoever's in the neighborhood is mother no duck. Well, when this thing comes in, whoever's in the neighborhood is enemy, you're it. I'm going to be able to feel my duty, honor, country here, my righteous indignation toward you. Bring, you old bringer of chaos.

[00:37:40.050] - Speaker 2
You're talking a little bit earlier about the Veterans of Foreign Wars and how alive they felt when they were engaged in warfare. I was thinking about people who do, say climbing, mountain climbing. And then I was thinking well, the difference between the two is in both situations there's a great deal of danger involved or there could be and there's a need for a certain amount of the magus knowing how to manipulate the carabiners or your rifle or whatever. But is the difference one of A, the enemy and B not being under orders when you're climbing the mountain? I mean, how significant is being under orders to these kinds of path?

[00:38:33.880] - Robert Moore
Well, sports in my view sports for the most part are sort of a primitive sublimation of this. And when you get a primitive sublimation you don't get the best parts with it. You get a certain kind of acting out. But there is no moral dimension to mountaineering  except in terms of say the mount climb or sense of triumphing over his own letter G or fear a lot of times over their own fear, that sort of thing. But there is clearly an enemy and usually my fear, my competitor isn't that.

[00:39:17.250] - Speaker 2
Closer though to the kind of things that what I'm trying to do is I'm trying to say humans love war.

[00:39:23.770] - Robert Moore
Okay?

[00:39:24.330] - Speaker 2
I know I've been fascinated with it all my life and I'm a Quaker, okay? You can think of some reasons for that, I'm sure.

[00:39:36.060] - Robert Moore
But.

[00:39:41.910] - Speaker 2
What I'm wondering is is there not a way of constellating the warrior in a in a less nefarious way?

[00:39:54.620] - Robert Moore
And that's what Freud talks about with sublimation. You can take the Freudian point of view on sublimation, okay?

[00:40:00.050] - Speaker 2
So mountain climbing is an exception

[00:40:02.770] - Robert Moore
or participation in sports. It's not clearly that. I mean you get the Super Bowl that's armageddon watered down and you see all that projection. Everybody projects their warrior on name Joe Green or somebody and projects their general on the quarterback, so forth and so on and then people can kind of get into that and there are people that really use that a lot and you can see that it does in fact work as a sublimation to some degree. But the interesting thing you need to think about is the way in which sports in many ways really loses a lot of positive things in the archetype. They are forms of sublimations. But you would get the idea and you get the idea that there isn't really any serious struggle to be engaged. That the most serious struggle is that between the Bears and some of the pigs and a lot of places in the city here that you can run into severe trouble. You suggest that that's not a very important thing but what you got to get a sense for is the way in which any sense of the true knight goes and the closest thing you can get to it is a pro ball player or some such thing.

[00:41:59.670] - Robert Moore
And that's sad. It's sad when men the best thing the men think of as a model of the masculine knight is a pro football player. That's tragic. But it tends to be the case. Like you said, it is a sublimation. Let's stop for about five minutes to stretch our legs and take a break and then we'll come back.

[00:42:27.070] - Robert Moore
Some of the manifestations of this in personal psychology. We've got some of them. Let me go through a few DSM, three R categories. And that's the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual that you familiar with used to diagnose various form of pathology. And of course, the one that comes to mind in terms of being out of touch with this thing is the dependent personality disorder because the dependent personality always takes the role of the fair maiden, not the knight. Right. And the claim is, of course, there is no warrior in me. In fact, the way the dependent personality you get this victim thing operating a lot in a dependent personality. It's like almost like their accident looking for a place to happen. Seem to have an uncanny way of finding abusive people to form dependent relationships. With a lot of time they will choose a narcissistic personality disorder to be a partner.

[00:44:15.310] - Robert Moore
You get a lot of marriages between dependent personalities and narcissistic personalities. Yes

[00:44:19.690] - Speaker 2
There is a book called Women Who Love Too Much.

[00:44:22.800] - Robert Moore
Yeah, that would be an example of this. The compulsive unconscious tie to someone who is a warrior acting out more on you. Of course, the denial that I can help any of this. I can't do anything about this. When you're out of touch with this archetype, you can't do anything. People will try to get you to but you will tell them you can't do anything. I can't. The motto, Anybody that comes on with it, I can't is out of touch with this thing in terms of conscious relationship. And they are projecting it onto somebody who's supposed to come in and do it. And if you tend to have a Sir Galahad complex you will be very susceptible to this except you will usually try to rescue this person from somebody with whom they've already formed an unconscious relationship. You're likely to get into the triangle where you will try to be the positive side of the archetypal drama the other negative side of the archetype you've got the Darth Vader, you got the Luke Skywalker and you got the Princess.

[00:46:03.890] - Robert Moore
So with the dependent personality this thing is repressed and projected with a compulsive personality. The person is identifying with it in a certain form but their defenses are such that they manage not to notice it too much. Like a compulsive personality will have what is known as usually have a sort of a horizontal split in the personality that is a repression barrier. And the compulsive personality will not be consciously aware a lot of the time of their violent fantasies, their homicidal fantasies. And whenever they get close to being aware of their homicidal fantasies and wishes they will get into ritually obsessive behaviors more and more compulsive. And Washington getting all the blood off your hands you wish you could do. Milan used to say peter Milan was great. Students of psychic pathology used to say that the compulsive personality is a combination of a passive dependent personality up here and an active independent personality. Or read that sociopath down here in the unconscious. So when you get a nice conflicted personality, their conscious mind would not hurt a fly. But they're working very hard to contain the killer within. And this is one of the hardest ones to see because the compulsive is not popular.

[00:48:27.810] - Robert Moore
And we talk about these as anal personalities. Oftentimes they're anal repeating their anal expulsive in the sense that they passive aggress you to death. But they didn't mean to, I forgot. And of course then you say to this person, well, you know, you haven't been dreaming since you're dreaming. That was a lot because they get past your considerable senses. And so for the next 20 weeks they bring you 42 dreams, essentially. Take that. Let's see how accurate you are with that. Let's see if you let's see if you can find the dreams in which you get it. Because if you take the time to read it, it takes 4 hours and you're not going to get paid for that. 4 hours. And if you don't take the time to read them now think about this if you're the therapist and you have the reading of a dream, if you don't take the time to read them, you're going to miss the one in which the therapist gets killed. Wonderful. It happens a lot to. Shitting on your therapist without ever having to admit it. Just being compliant. The compulsive is very compliant, but the warrior is always digging into it.

[00:50:37.450] - Robert Moore
This is a dagger personality. We talked about the dagger personality as opposed to the sword personality. This is a dagger personality. You get it in the back when you're not looking. And they never moved me. I didn't do that.

[00:50:55.570] - Speaker 2
Would you include people that compulsivity deals with addictions, alcohol, food, drugs in this group?

[00:51:07.190] - Robert Moore
Well, with compulsions there's usually a lot of hidden dumping that doesn't meet the eye unless you're around. But with that it's a little different because with a substance abuser, if you're a substance abuser, it's a lot harder to appear nice. And this person is nice

[00:51:37.710] - Speaker 2
unless food is what you're complaining about.

[00:51:40.030] - Robert Moore
Well, something to do that, I guess. But all compulsive behaviors are dominated by unconscious archetypal configurations. There's the time, but this one is more specific. This one and you've got this you've got this guy with a knife in the unconscious and it comes out in your dream. You see the dreams if you dream. But a lot of the time the person will hold back the dreams, as I say, or will dump them. But now the narcissistic personality disorder, that's number three is not this is not the primary dominant.

[00:52:38.690] - Robert Moore
The king is the primary dominant, in the narcissistic personality disorder. But guess what? They're quite willing for you to become their knight. And so they're constantly projecting the warrior onto you. You will be you are chosen. You have this opportunity to serve me. And there are of course a lot of narcissistic personalities who play the role of the archetypal king and this unconscious warrior in us. We want to serve somebody and if the guy is good enough, you notice they just line up, come in there to salute, stand in line and be inspected. And so the projection is different. But notice how similar it is to the dependent personality. Listen, the narcissistic personality and the dependent both want to press the Knight into service. They both do it, they both press knights into service and narcissists. They will often have a lot of knights around that sort of pledge their fielty. And as long as it works like this, they are very dutiful and they serve. And if it's set up right, that can just go for a long time.

[00:54:31.350] - Speaker 2
Would this be like a guru?

[00:54:33.350] - Robert Moore
Very common guru pattern. A guru can get into that 9th position and have a lot of people society of Jesus in terms of their loyalty to the Pope. Pope plays the archetype of king and sight of Jesus and functions as the knights. And of course, depending on here again, here's your leader, then you're at the mercy of this outer king. Problem with these outer kings is they tend to have a lot of limitations that you don't notice for a long time. There are a lot of trials of former cult members by former cult members who now come back and they're going to sue the guru because he wasn't the true king they discovered and they served as loyal knights for seven years and he wasn't the true king, see? And so in effect, you're going to sue the guru for an archetype for their archetypal transfer. You maybe have an archetypal transfer to you.

[00:56:09.030] - Speaker 2
Where does Jim Jones bring that? Right there.

[00:56:22.730] - Robert Moore
He would rather have all of his knights have a loyal expression of their dutiful death. The beauty of holiness. The beauty of holiness as you sacrifice yourself and loyalty to me. True king.

[00:56:47.250] - Robert Moore
This is a beautiful thing you're doing. Don't come back alive. You think it's just Nazis and gurus? My daughter got one of his best generals in there when he was in that new game campaign and he got him in there and he says, he says, if you take Juna, I will decorate you. I'll see that you get Australian, blah, blah, blah frost, I will release your name to the press. But do it or don't come back live. Do it or don't come back live.

[00:57:38.130] - Speaker 2
What was the name of that movie documentary about the concert that you mentioned?

[00:57:43.460] - Robert Moore
It's called American Caesar. American Caesar. Yeah. Like I say. Manchester. William Manchester. Love hate relationship with these archetypes. Always writing about them, compulsively writing. Churchill, you know, Churchill, he just gets off and talking about their narcissism and disparages. In the notes, the writing is,

[00:58:23.150] - Speaker 2
is the narcissistic disorder in the Hitler? And is the narcissistic disorder in in MacArthur and in the Guru? But then that's a perversion of a king. That's right. But then how does that fit in under the pathological expressions of the wise archetype?

[00:58:48.430] - Robert Moore
Well, because, you see, the narcissistic personality disorder needs knights, and it is not an expression of this, except insofar as a narcissist. True narcissist doesn't do a lot of work. They press you into their service.

[00:59:10.830] - Speaker 2
Does it, King? Again, of course it is,

[00:59:14.750] - Robert Moore
But I'm putting it here because you need to see how these things relate to this archetype. All of the different pathologies relate to the archetype. They don't.

[00:59:26.870] - Speaker 2
It's a king going wrong. Well, he fits in the warrior relationship. He's pushing into that role as well.

[00:59:37.290] - Robert Moore
The point of it is, if you're a narcissistic personality disorder, you haven't developed your own warrior enough. Because if you're a narcissistic personality disorder, you're not loyal to anything except yourself. See, that there is a pathology of the warrior. It's just that the warrior is not dominant in your ego. It is in your shadow. But it's unconscious in your shadow. And because it's unconscious in your shadow, you can't have the warrior. No, there's no narcissist that has any warrior virtues. Get it? No narcissist has warrior virtues because they're not loyal to anything. And they would sure as hell not sacrifice themselves. They'll sacrifice you. But I'm not going to sacrifice see, McCarthur during his younger days was not into the king so much. He wasn't so possessed to begin. He was the archetypal general, and he was a magnificent battlefield general in the First World War, contrary to what a lot of people say about him, he was magnificent. But when he got in his later years, he got more into that narcissist king thing and sort of the king in his role as Commander in Chief. And he didn't like it that there was an imposter Harry Truman FDR. And Harry Truman really shouldn't have been president in his view, if somebody had their hand.

[01:01:15.770] - Speaker 2
I was just wondering, when you say narcissistic personality disorder, are you speaking of the actual criteria? You're not talking about the self psychological?

[01:01:24.980] - Robert Moore
No, because according to kohut and self psychology, all of us, whatever our particular symptom pattern, have narcissistic pathology. And when I'm talking about narcissistic personality disorder, I'm talking about the person whose ego is dominated by this sort of shadow king archetype, and they shadow the king archetype and who expects to be adored and worshipped and expects your fielty. And when they come in the room, you're supposed to kneel. And the amazing thing about it is, if one of these is good and they come in and riddle, you'll find yourself starting, you'll find it compulsive and it's amazing.

[01:02:19.530] - Robert Moore
There are other versions of that. There's also bending over and there's a whole I mean, there is a lot of compulsive submission to this king archetype. And it is that knight thing that's doing it. You put the king archetype in there, the warrior knight will go in there and kneel and be loyal and won't be able to see a thing wrong with that king as long as they're in that place.

[01:03:00.170] - Robert Moore
Okay. Now, of course, this one is more passive. The narcissistic personality is more passive. And then you get what Milan calls the active independent, or what we might call the antisocial psychopath or sociopath. Feels better. I think they call it antisocial. Well, the antisocial is the more warlike version of the sort of the Alexander Hay complex. This is the warrior in its possessed mode. It's like this is the pre emptive strike. This is I'm going to do it to you. I'm going to do it to you

[01:04:05.790] - Speaker 2
like the Colonel inductor, strange look. Yeah.

[01:04:11.230] - Robert Moore
Jokes about it. You got to see this when you see this, the antisocial personality disorder. If you've never been around this, then it'd be hard for you to get a sense for it. But if you're ever around it, the hair will crawl back your neck that you're not used to. When you're around this, it's like you begin to realize that this being that you're with doesn't have any inhibitors and that they would and probably have killed a lot and don't feel a lot about it. We make a lot out of these multiple serial killers. But there is a lot of this and there's a lot of it in the military. Why don't we build your Fortune magazine? Gordon Libby. Gordon Libby. And but this is this is the person who, who is who has got the king of mountain narcissism. You see, they are also got a lot of this knight energy, but there isn't anybody else for them to be loyal to. When you got the narcissist narcissist, but when you this dude, it is the king of a mountain in his war boat. And he's not bothering with being the king on the throne. He's the one in the war chariot or he's the one that's out there carrying the fight on. And you don't see too much of this. But this is a very popular one in business, successful entrepreneurs.

[01:06:36.110] - Robert Moore
There would probably be a lot of that. I mean, the point of it is it depends on it's. The operative that has no morals whatsoever. The operative that has no ethics, no morals and understands. That the interesting thing about this one, it's totally cynical. Totally cynical. Nothing is sacred. And you get this a lot now in a lot of places, people. This is the person that will come. This is a powerful male. Powerful male who will look you in the eye and with great papal infallibility say to you, everybody does it

[01:07:33.090] - Speaker 2
like Gordon Gecko in that movie Wall Street.

[01:07:36.470] - Robert Moore
Yeah, that's his thought. Everybody is doing it all politicians are corrupt. Everybody has their price. Yeah, every man has got his price. See, it's Al Capone in the movie The Untouchables. And you see the difference between Al Capone and more passive, independent type, or the narcissistic type alone gets up with his baseball bat and he comes around behind the guy. He doesn't have somebody shooting. He could have him shot. He wants to do it himself. He wants to see that blood spurred all over the table, and he wants to watch all his little macho knights tremble before the big daddy.

[01:08:47.270] - Robert Moore
But the thing about the mark of it is this is pure. This is real pure. If you want to see this archetype in its purest form, totally unadulterated with anything like human ego, this is what you get. It's sort of the model of the stormtrooper death head SS colonel. That is the norm. You are to be steal. And any kind of compassion or pity is weakness. That's its motto. Any moment of humanity is weakness.

[01:09:41.930] - Speaker 2
These people begin to code the behavior.

[01:09:47.710] - Robert Moore
For you. But for this person, every rule is made to be broken. See how it's not really a warrior? It is the perversion of all the warrior virtues. Because this is the human being that will use your commitment to the code to kill you. And then after they have killed you because you have adhered to the code, or if they have just disabled you, then they will rape and kill your wife and kids in front of you and they will try not to kill you until you've seen enough of this as possible

[01:10:35.690] - Speaker 2
no win situation.

[01:10:37.230] - Robert Moore
This is Idi Amin and people that have not had the guts to look at this phenomenon in human history, but there is so much evidence about it. I mean, there's so much historical documentary evidence about this and the way it manifests all over the place, that is pretty much uncontrovertible. But this is not your kinght torturer, your torturer that's torturing you for the good of the Nicaraguan government or the good of the whatever government or the good of the Congress. That's not this. This one is the one that power is everything and fun. There's a real erotic quality to the sadism.

[01:11:49.370] - Robert Moore
This is Satan at large. It's that you can really see it in the sort of love of death. This thing really loves death, your death. And but now, again, let me say that is the one you look at when you want to see this archetype without benefit of any kind of modulation. And that's scary.

[01:12:26.670] - Speaker 2
Where would Al Pacino fit in the Godfather side?

[01:12:31.550] - Robert Moore
Oh, my gosh, it's been so long since I've seen those. I don't know. You get these codes of honor, these sort of feudal codes of honor. And there are a lot of these mafia groups that operate under a kind of code, knightly code. And to the extent that there is any kind of knightly code that's operating. This is more like a typical human ability to define the in group against the out group and have knightly code of honor in the in group. And anything goes with the out group because they are a pseudo species. You follow that this archetype is behind pseudospeciation. And Eric erickson talked about the making the other into less than human and it's just a matter of how wide you extend your circle. The in group is human and we have a code for that.

[01:13:36.790] - Robert Moore
But the out group is less than human and we don't have to treat them with the same respect. Yes, thank you.

[01:13:47.130] - Speaker 2
Nietzsche talks about this a lot, doesn't he says toward one's own class one has these things toward those of a lower rank, whatever suits you. So you have a code on one hand and absolutely no boundaries or barriers

[01:14:09.070] - Robert Moore
The Nazis were able to appropriate. And you get that Nazi SS ethics here. Among Nazis you do have this kind of pride in this free,

[01:14:28.230] - Speaker 2
I think you're right saying they perverted that because he was very cynical about saying anything about justification of building up arms either for defense or offense because it implied that the other person was untrustworthy at the very least.

[01:14:47.210] - Robert Moore
Well, one of the things Nietzsche is a wonderful psychology is one of the forerunners of depth psychology. That is to say, he saw through all of the facades of Niceness, of Christian civilization and he saw the warrior operating behind in the Niceness. And Nietzsche was one of the ones that would say the Christians, what they're doing is trying to get you to lay down your sword. And then of course, once they get you to lay down your sword then they will roll right over you.

[01:15:34.170] - Speaker 2
He defended Jews in an uncharacter or at least other people would say that he was anti Semite, but that wasn't true that he was defending Jews. They survived Christianity for 2000 years.

[01:15:50.690] - Robert Moore
He saw the little way in which popular Christianity sort of made assertiveness into something had to be in the shadow. He really understood that. And then he saw the fact that in the Jewish faith you don't have the same ambivalence toward the warrior archetype. And there's a lot you can say about that. We can go on and on. But let me say a few more words here about you could take all of the particular syndromes and you could look at the way in which they relate to this and the way in which they would use a projection onto a warrior and we can talk about that a little more next time. But you want to look carefully at the way this operates in relationships, particularly in forms of passive aggression. The DSM Three passive aggressive personality is really a misnomer because passive aggressive personality, as it's described in the Diagnostic manual, is really more aggressive than passive. Milan, when he wrote about this in his basic text on psychopathology, called it the Negativistic personality and that is a more adequate passive aggressive personality disorder.

[01:17:34.600] - Robert Moore
And the diagnostic manual is really negativistic and critical. And you can see the warrior there and a person that's always criticizing everything and always negative about everything, you can see the warrior manifesting. It doesn't ever get strong enough to do anything constructive. It just carps a lot. And you can notice this in people that complain a lot. And you can notice, for example, in your staff, when you find yourself complaining a lot, you notice that if a person is into complaining a lot, they don't tend to do much very interesting. They don't tend to take much effective action about changing anything. They just grasp a lot.


The Warrior Within 06	[00:00:00.970] - Robert Moore
So so this is a person of the so called he called it negativistic. And that sort of got enough warrior energy turned up just to get irritable that's can't even get to the fight you just kind of want. And if somebody comes in and says, okay, you didn't really mean for it to get to that. But always look in any form.

[00:00:55.960] - Robert Moore
Let's talk about passive aggression, rather than the passive aggressive, so called passive aggressive personality.

[00:01:01.890] - Robert Moore
In passive aggression, which you see more, as we said earlier, in policy kind of style. In passive aggression, you see the sort of self depotentiation of the person and the way the person has to smuggle the aggression in. This happens a lot in men who are unable to get themselves going, get themselves moving at all in any kind of sizey way. You will notice once you start having eyes to see the way in which the warrior energy is kind of just going underground, dissipating. You see it clearly in passive aggressive behaviors. Just name them. Well, procrastination just the case in which a person never will go ahead and raise a question about actions. If you're a therapist and you let people a lot of times they will go for months without ever raising the question of anything they should do.

[00:02:29.790] - Robert Moore
It's very interesting. If a therapist is interested enough in dreams, then you can you can delay any action forever and try to try to stay awake on this. Yeah, well, live the dreams next week. What should you do that always shifts everything? Because see the warrior in them knows. I have discovered that everybody always knows what they should do. It's uncanny. They got a list of what they should do. They know they should do it, but they don't let themselves think it. And once you create a space where they can think what they need to do, then this warrior, they can be constellated and can be accessed. And then you can support it. You can support the warriors. They start to do battle, but you have to create a space for it. And my basic sense is that contrary to popular myths, most men are enormously passive aggressive. Enormously passive aggressive. But the biggest problem is not all masculine aggression. The biggest problem is masculine passive aggression. You show me a passive aggressive male, I'll show you an angry male

[00:04:20.610] - Speaker 2
called grief.

[00:04:23.200] - Robert Moore
Grief. Now, that's an interesting comment. Why?

[00:04:26.790] - Speaker 2
Well, it's just really being down, right?

[00:04:36.540] - Robert Moore
He's depressed by definition. Show me a passive aggressive man, I'll show you a depressed man. And it probably is a form of grief. And what is he grieving for? Probably all these warrior potentials that he knows are in him. He knows that there's more to life than this, and he knows he ought to be living it with some passion. But he is completely at a loss to even connect with this thing. And what you get? He's angry. He's seething in it. He is likely very irritable.

[00:05:26.250] - Speaker 2
Could it be a sense that he might be grieving his own death?

[00:05:33.690] - Robert Moore
Well, in a sense, he is not living. I think that's suggesting but

[00:05:43.310] - Speaker 2
could be angry that he's given us power away.

[00:05:48.030] - Robert Moore
Usually he blames it on a woman. If it weren't for women, men would have to invent, because I never talked to a man whose problems weren't caused by a woman in his mind

[00:06:12.950] - Speaker 2
unless he was gay.

[00:06:16.650] - Robert Moore
Some of those guys can even blame another woman. And a lot of the time they just love attacking women. But basically the thing, the rap on this is that the woman has not taken away the power.

[00:06:45.490] - Robert Moore
But men like to feel this way. It's amazing to watch grown men who are terrified of their wives, and most men who are having an extramarital affair are terrified of their wives. I think that I have never seen a single extramarital affair in which the man wasn't afraid of his wife.

[00:07:21.530] - Robert Moore
It is okay, we're going. Well, it's very simple, because men tend to project the goddess onto the archetype of feminine, onto the wife. That is a displeased goddess. You got to understand, whenever you're talking about these archetypes, they are not human forms. And even to call it a witch is not accurate because you're not talking about a witch. I mean, I know lots of witches, really nice folk, and they're usually very gentle and loving when we're looking at the goddess who is pissed. This is a formiddable being in the man's mind. And this article by John Bibi, you got to read this article in Murray science book Young Analysis. He's got this article in there on psychopathology by Sandmar and BB. And they've got this way in which the man's animus splits and the way the woman's on him is split. And he's got this one thing he's talking the woman is the commanding whore, commanding horror.

[00:08:48.170] - Robert Moore
Well, that's an archetypal goddess projection on the part of man, usually on his living partner, practically never on any other woman. It's usually the one that gets the mother projection. And then they're terrified. And not only that they're terrified, but they have incredibly high expectations that the woman ought to be totally understanding about everything and never mad. A woman, by definition, should never be angry. This is man. This is a male fantasy. And if a woman is angry, she is by definition bad. She is also by definition, strong and dangerous and more dangerous than me unless I pull out all of my artillery. And the constellation that usually happens in relationships is that the man is scared. He feels like a boy. The woman is viewed as very powerful, demanding and displeased. And the boy will become more and more afraid and more and more fragmenting until the archetypal masculine gets sick of it. That is to say, there is an angry god, too. Angry Goddess. But there's also an angry God. And the angry god gets sick of all this stuff around and comes in and blasts through the ego personality. And then what you've got is an angry god acting out.

[00:10:52.430] - Robert Moore
And then you have these little odor domarones. You've got the angry god dealing with the angry goddess and that then we're off to Braces. That's what happens in relationships a great deal. And the cure of that is very simple. You got to get the god and the goddess out of there. They shouldn't be in the interactions. There will be humans interacting.

[00:11:19.850] - Speaker 2
How does one develop the ego then, in the face of that? If you're engaging the warrior archetype, then it seems like you could run. Failure is the only way that the ego develops. Ideally

[00:11:39.250] - Robert Moore
we're going to focus a lot on developing an ego and developing the right relationship with archetype next week. But that doesn't help it. I guarantee you that kind of interaction, that doesn't help anything. Because what happens in that is that the warrior archetype and the male comes finally in many cases in blasting him and does violence usually, or at least threatens it very often does it. And then of course, incredible shame to the extent the person has an ego at all, because the human being knows that knights don't eat up. Fair ladies. I'm sorry, it'll never happen again.

[00:12:36.450] - Robert Moore
I'll do anything. He won't leave me. So the boy supplicant to the mother again. And this will go in a while until the god gets his and gets sick of this boy and says get up and then we're off to the races. And so what you got to do, there's got to be a tremendous amount of awareness in both about this warrior archetype business and how it will possess them both. And it does. The female warrior and the male warrior go after it. And a relationship, as you know from probably you have had many experiences with this, a relationship will sustain just so much of this warrior business. Not a lot, because when that warrior is constellated it's good at it, it's like this warrior archetype in both the man and the woman. And remember, you got it in your contraceptual due. And when this thing is constellated, it intends to do damage. It doesn't intend to have a reconciliation, it doesn't intend to have an understanding, it doesn't intend to build any bridges, it intends to destroy and so all that stuff, remember, do you remember the book Creative Aggression? Yeah. Bach that man ought to be sued because he formented a lot of this creative aggression between couples.

[00:14:34.230] - Robert Moore
Well, fact is, you got to understand the way archetypes work. When archetypes fight, humans lose.

[00:14:44.250] - Speaker 2
Pad sticks, if I remember correctly.

[00:14:47.450] - Robert Moore
When archetypes fight, humans lose. Human relations don't survive it. So what's got to happen is the woman has got to get into her warrior so she doesn't need to project it on the man and have him be carrying it unconsciously for and the man has got to get in touch with his warrior so that he doesn't feel that he is not the equal of the woman. The horrible truth is, most men do not feel themselves to be the equal of their woman. I hate to tell you this and we will get along on better between the sexes when the man feels equal to the woman. We'll talk about how I can get that way next week.

[00:15:43.710] - Robert Moore
Just do a little quick review and then we'll get into healing the warrior psyche. In order for us to work with the stuff we're working with tonight, you got to really crank up your understanding of Union theory, of the way in which ego and archetypes need to be related and the way in. Which this process of healing in terms of connections with the archetypal operates in general, in the masculine and feminine psyche and with regard to any archetypal potential.

[00:16:39.030] - Robert Moore
Tonight we're going to focus. We're going to try to spend a little bit of time on the warrior energy. But it won't make any sense. You don't try to get back into your understanding of way with ego and architect related. Still having problems with this. Try to get that Eddinger book Ego and Archetype to get a sense about the emergence and development of the ego from identification of isma archetypal. In the process getting to a position where alienated prominent and then moving back into what Eddieger calls the eco self axis. Remember the archetype. Let me score archetypes again so that you get clear about them. Archetypes are one sided. It's almost like stereotype. You don't want to be an archetype. You don't want an archetype having too much power for you. An archetype is an enormous source of energy. It is a certain configuration. It has certain potentials in it. It is high voltage. You ought to think about it as being like a 220,000 volts wire. You don't want to go around plugging into it willy nitty. It gets you killed. All these get you killed. All the archives will get you killed somewhat.

[00:18:25.890] - Robert Moore
Certainly get your human ego. It'll make you psychotic. If you're too much out of touch with them, you'll be depressed. Or if you're in danger of being possessed by them, you'll have an adaptive depression. To keep you from being psychotic. But just remember when you read archetype in Jungian psychology, this is a numinous thing loaded with energy. And it is not something you want to mainline. You don't want to freebase it, but you want to connect with it. Because if you're not connected with it in a constructive way, you will inevitably be depressed and you will have very little energy and you won't have any sense of fullness as a person. You won't have any sense of your own potential and power. You will not be excited about yourself. You will not be enthusiastic about yourself. If you're not enthusiastic about yourself, you're out of touch with the archetypal. So the word enthusiasm, fire, god, okay? You connect traditionally in human culture, you connect with archetypal energies in ritual spaces. That's the way human beings always did until the modern world came along and declared all this archetypal business superstition. Then you're guaranteed to have Naziism.

[00:20:13.910] - Robert Moore
Because once you don't have any archetypal sacred realm of gods and goddesses, then all as Jung pointed out, all that magical energy collapses into the human realm and people identify with it and they get crazy. In other words, we get an archetypal posssession where people act as if they think they're gods or they act as if some other human is god illegally. Remember we talked about how when you're talking about the warrior archetype, we don't want to get the idea that this is the masculine archetype or that this archetype ought to have some preference in masculine psychology from hegemony because it should not. It often does. And those of us that just work ourselves to death all the time workaholics here, nobody here workaholic. You just come out to classes like this on cold ice. Just for the hell of it. But anyway, remember what I said about, about the, about these four in fact my basic ramp on archetypal psychology, the psychology, the archetypes of course, is this thing where you've got the divine couples. Not one like Jung said, not the hieroglyphs, the thing of marriage. Although you got the marriage of four couples. You got king and queen, you got the two warriors, you got the two magicians or priests, priestesses, however you want to call that.

[00:22:16.570] - Robert Moore
And you got the two lovers. And you can plot all of the disasters in human relationships with these expressions of the archetypal, masculine, archetypal, feminine. Now we're focusing on the warrior, particularly in the masculine warrior psyche, in the masculine or you could say the warrior aspect of the animus of the woman. But all this understood that all these things need to be mutually regulating each other and cooperating operating in a cooperative way in order that these human potentials be actualized appropriately and creatively and constructively in human life. And to minimize compulsive behaviors. That's a rule. Compulsive behavior will result whenever you are accessing archetypal energy in some inappropriate way. You'll get compulsive and one or the other of these things will have more dominance in your life than is good for you. And you will compulsively seek out one type of the feminine or one type of the masculine because of the blank spots in your own psyche. And you won't let the people you relate to actualize certain parts of their psyche because you're not comfortable with it. So in other words, to the extent that you're partial, you will require that others be okay.

[00:24:16.600] - Robert Moore
So you got to keep this in mind and understand that the goal in this whole process is this is what Jung talks about as individuation, individuation is what I'm talking about. You get clear that you're not any of these archetypes that that's not your job. You are to become fully human. You're to become as full an expression of a human animal as is possible and that the range of human experience that you're able to incarnate in a creative and constructive way is max. Maximum. Then we focus in on the warrior potential and pathology. We talked about the potential last time we talked about the pathology and we emphasized the extent to which gratuitous compulsive violence is a major expression including paranoid behaviors, paranoid ideation paranoid behaviors where you see enemies where they are not and if you create them wherever you can. Because of the way in which the warrior archetype always has to have an enemy, must have an enemy. We talked about the way in which passive aggression is also major manifestation of pathology in this archetype of the warrior. We talked about the way in which you get a lot of nihilism and cynicism when you got a pathology in the warrior because whenever you're not connected with the warrior in yourself then you have no sense of duty, honor, transegoic, commitment.

[00:26:34.350] - Robert Moore
In other words, what we accept is pretty normative about the way in which we think about things today from the archetypal point of view is a pathology of this archetype. That is, the extent to which 20th century human beings have gotten lost in sort of an existentialist nihilism is a pathology in this connection with this archetype because we consider it sophisticated not to be idealistic. In fact, we kinda snicker at people that are idealistic and we call them non coyotes dreaming the impossible dream. But from an archetypal point of view, the lack of a capacity to experience any kind of transpersonal values, any kind of transpersonal commitments, any kind of willingness to sacrifice for something that is not merely narcissistic would be, from the point of view of the psychology of this archetype, a pathology in connection with this archetype. Okay? Can you see how that works? Because by definition of this thing if you're connected with this thing then you can feel what it would be like to care so deeply about something that you would be willing to be sacrificial for those values or for that reality or, for example, a just order.

[00:28:21.390] - Robert Moore
That's what this thing is tied up here. The archetypal concept of sort of a just cosmos service to this is that old Arthurian legend, old Knights of the Roundtable business is grounded right into this. Now, of course, people have been very clear about the way in which tribalism what a malignant tribalism and malignant nationalism has been grounded in this thing. And that's true. That's true. Probably most poignant studies of this or that. For example, see all the left in front or read some of that World War One, post World War I anti war literature on the trench warfare in World War One because you really get a sense about the awareness about the mindless SWAT that occurs when this thing kind of takes over. The British were shocked to realize that on one day, one day in one battle, First World War, there were 60,000 of their young men that were casualties 60,000 in one day dead. More than we had in casualties in the whole Vietnam War. One death. And if you study you study the naivete of Victorian England about this archetype and that sense of righteousness. Righteousness. The English empire. Some circles still exist and enables the British to continue some of their Northern Ireland policies without any criticism.

[00:31:07.190] - Robert Moore
Need to study a lot of history to fill this out. That's where you really get a sense of the pathology of the warrior and the compulsiveness with which it takes over. Now, the question of healing any archetypal energy in anybody's psyche operates a very similar way. One has to be able to open up connections with this energy without being overwhelmed by it that. Sounds simple. Just going to create an ego self axis. And that would be simple if this thing were not so powerful and so seductive. Kind of hard to think up an image of what it's like except in history, in mythology, they got some images of this. And the hero fighting the dragon is one image of the job of dealing with this archetypal energy. And I don't mean a little dragon, I mean a little hero. If you want to get a feeling for this, there's nothing better than that movie, checking out that movie, that little kid movie called Dragon Slayer and getting a little sense about be clear when you see the movie that the little sort of adolescent hero is the ego. And he's going down into the cave to do battle with this dragon that's eating maidens.

[00:33:12.750] - Robert Moore
And he's got his little sword and he's going to go down there and whip up on this plane. He gets down there and looks around their fire. It's a wonderful dragon cave. Fire is burning in the water. He looks around and the thing's not there and you can tell what he's thinking. He guesses to himself that it's got scared and left. But back in the water behind him, you can see something coming up and the head of this thing comes up and the head of it is taller than he is. Just the head is taller than he is. He sees it just in time and takes off and realizes that he's got to go talk to a magician or somebody to figure out what to do about this thing because he's not as prepared as he thought. Now that is the situation between the ego and the archetype. Because the archetype is not just some nice dialogue partner. That's the problem. It is enormously powerful. And as long as you stay completely away from it consciously, you can have all sorts of fantasies about dealing with it as equals. But when you get down in the unconscious it isn't the same size, it's more like in the mythology of Tiamont and Marduk.

[00:34:35.190] - Robert Moore
Tiamont is the great dragon presented as the mother. Some of the sexist stuff and some of our interpretations called it it's not the mother, it's the unconscious. It's the archetypal psyche. The archetypal psyche is the great dragon. And it is so powerful and so big and will gobble you up so quickly so that there won't even be any sense that there was an ego there. And you've got to try to get into and the only way to do that is with images. And so I'm not kidding, it would be good to see that movie just to get a feeling for the inequality of the relationship between the ego and the archetype and why when you get into this thing, once you touch it it's, like it's contagious and it will take you over. Once you get up I can get up. But once you touch the archetype of energy, it infects you and suddenly you're gone and it exists.

[00:35:47.310] - Speaker 2
This is the story of David and Goliath from the Bible.

[00:35:51.890] - Robert Moore
Well, you could see this. There are all these motifs in human history about little people fighting giants and the Titans. The image of the Titans that you have to fight are the great cyclops that you have to battle in these evocycles.

[00:36:11.450] - Robert Moore
It's all about this because you can almost say, yeah, the archetype is one eye. It doesn't have a stereoscopic view. An archetype has a one eyed view of things, and yet it is huge. And in practice, it is infantile. It's like there is this great infantile giant within Jack and the Beanstalk. The task is to be able to somehow connect with that without having it be able to get a hand on you. Once it ever gets you, you're gone. I mean, there's no hope for you once it ever gets you. And that's one of the wisdom things in human folklore. That is, once you get an archetypal possession, you cannot liberate yourself. Never. You never liberate yourself. Once you get an archetypal possession, it functions exactly like the devil in Faust does. That's an excellent interpretation.

[00:37:32.590] - Speaker 2
Yes, but how does that come about? How does the archetype

[00:37:35.560] - Robert Moore
Well, it's the same thing. For example, let's take the archetype of a lover. When one falls in love, that is happening. Fall in love. And suddenly you who have been such a workaholic and you're just not interested in relationships and you're into your career and your career trajectory and your position in the community.

[00:38:11.390] - Robert Moore
And you're Deacon at St. Stephen's or Christchurch Episcopal, or you're on the best tree or you're a big person in the community, blah, blah, blah, blah. And all of a sudden the archetype of the lover will manifest out of your shadow because you've not honored it at all. It's like in townhouse.

[00:38:38.870] - Speaker 2
In what?

[00:38:39.690] - Robert Moore
In townhouse or the opera townhouse. You haven't been worshipping Venus Aphrodite. You haven't been worshipping her. That makes God is mad and she gets you and all of a sudden it's very fascinating, the total transformation. You don't care about any of that stuff. You were totally committed to before and all of a sudden you will do anything for this person that you are now in love with. I would say you are now possessed by the archetypal lover. And this is when the person will say I cannot live without this person. That's clearly a possession. Anybody that says I can't live without a X person is in some sort of possession state. Anything that you are not very well developed in you will be very vulnerable to a compulsive possession by it. And it will look for example a person who has not really worked on the lover side of their personality will be very vulnerable to pathologies of love

[00:40:01.970] - Speaker 2
because we've been projecting it onto others.

[00:40:05.890] - Robert Moore
It has not been developed as something that is developed in yourself with a little s in your ego as ego psychology. You have not really worked on this to where it's regulated, where you have access to it without compulsiveness. And so you get into loving booze or you get in that you're a compulsive smoker. You get into loving when I smoke I love smoking. I mean, I just smoke. I love smoking. Or get into good bourbon. You don't just drink anything. Drink good bourbon and you will love it. But if if you're wounded in this lover thing, you your compulsiveness of the lover side will come out and it will catch you unconsciously and you'll be compulsively loved. And you won't really have any control about this. And you'll tell people that you can't control it. And a lot of time, if they don't have any experience of this, they will think you'll that you just go bridge. But in fact, you can't control. Well, the parallel thing happens with this warrior. To the extent that it is not well developed in a man's human ego as something that he has worked on developing and consolidating and being capable of accessing consciously and out of will, he will be enormously vulnerable to either projecting it on someone else, male or female. Or. Possessions by it from time to time in which he acts out really crazy, violent behaviours.

[00:42:12.710] - Speaker 2
Yeah, that's why occasionally there's this guy that goes berserk and kills a few people and the neighbors say oh, he was such a nice guy.

[00:42:20.430] - Robert Moore
Exactly. You got to really look out for really nice guy. A super nice guy always likes the eyes. Because if the thing is about to go out off with a super nice guy, a lot of the times it shows in the eyes before they go. That's what a lot of the clinicians talk about, is a sort of a Skip spring look or a psychotic look in the eyes before somebody really gets acting out. It is a sign that that thing is getting ready to pop and but that's what Jungians  talk about when this thing is in the shadow and it's not related to ego. So first thing in healing the warrior, one has to do an assessment of where one is with regard to this thing. What happens to this archetypal energy in one's life. And you just got to do a careful review and just look at it. A lot of the time you'll find it's manifest itself in a myriad of ways and it's not the same.

[00:43:59.460] - Robert Moore
You'll notice that it will be projected. There will be certain people that will carry the projection and sometimes there'll be people that have a lot of time irrational tempers. So and so has a temper. Well, that was that's always an example of someone whose connection with this is not well repressed. We talk about vertical splits in the psyche and horizontal splits. With a horizontal split you very seldom feel its presence and recognize it. Who's got a horizontal split? Usually a compulsive personality. Compulsive personalities usually feel nice. Most of the time they are irritated with you, but they don't feel aggressive. They don't feel a lot of their rage towards you consciously. They don't get into fantasies of blowing your brains out. No, they don't do that.

[00:45:23.750] - Speaker 2
You really find me again. They feel uncomfortable around you because they're not

[00:45:30.890] - Robert Moore
when a compulsive personality is not regressed, they don't feel their aggression. They think you're aggressive

[00:45:41.550] - Speaker 2
because they projected it on me.

[00:45:44.030] - Robert Moore
If I don't feel it and I'm not aware of it, it's projected onto you and I'm holding it down with all my life. But if I'm not really fatigued or tired or I'm not drinking or something sick, then I don't conscious my ego consciousness does not feel it, but I do project it. But I also act it out passively. So I will do my best to attack you in subtle ways to express my aggression. See, the aggression will always be expressed. That's the rule some way. And if I am masochistic to the extent that you haven't got this thing integrated, you will be either organized more sadistically or you will be organized more masochistically. And usually it's a combination of both. But if it's masochistic, that means I project this onto someone and I need an abusive boss and I will be more obsequious with my boss than I need to be more obsequious, brown nosing, I will be somebody. You will find that there are a lot of people that are very compliant who could get away with not being they don't believe they could get away with not being compliant, but they really believe they must be. There is an unconscious message that's going on to the warrior and the other person's and the boss's personality to manifest. I take the victim role. You hear about the victim complexes and all that sort of thing that is related to the pathology this archetype.

[00:47:55.510] - Robert Moore
So if you're looking for a way in which one can be acted upon by this. Thing. In other words, you're going to rule an archetypal archetypal psychology stuff is that you're going to make contact with this. You are definitely going to make contact with it. It's not a question of are you or are you not. The question is how are you going to connect? Yes

[00:48:20.350] - Speaker 2
employee and boss could be a knight and a king

[00:48:23.970] - Robert Moore
Could be. But you see, if the king gets into Abusing you in a sadistic way, that's coming out of this place. Because when the king is just being there on the throne, being the king, organizing the kingdom by virtue of his virtue, he's not being sadistic. He's not acting out in sadistic ways like so many bosses do. And see, one of the things when you study the active independent personality, sort of a sociopathic personality who is sort of the king in his warrior mode, you get that sense of the Alexander Hay personality.

[00:49:11.310] - Speaker 2
If the king is a good king and organizes the kingdom by virtue of his virtue, will it always come to pass that eventually the knights will overthrow him and replace him with another king? Or does it have to be done?

[00:49:24.150] - Robert Moore
Well, my sense is that a lot of that there's a blood in the water syndrome that happens with executive types of leaders. And if the king is really unsure and he's really out of touch with himself and he's sort of playing king, he will invite a lot of palace for Bay palace.

[00:49:54.670] - Speaker 2
What if he is in the normal course of a business cycle? What if he is on his ass? What if the company is struggling or setbacks? I've had situations where people have gathered around. There came when he was about an inch from collapse and they shored him up. They didn't take him over.

[00:50:12.980] - Robert Moore
Good knights. That's the functioning of the good night to the lord. So archetypally, that's what the knights do for Arthur. He's being threatened, they come to his face. There's no king that doesn't need knights who are really loyal. Let me be an example of that. But what I'm talking about here is your sadistic acting out person. But I'm suggesting that a lot of the time in these interactions, it's not really a conscious thing on the part of the boss. There will be a sort of a kick me sweatshirt written across the subliminal part of the psyche.

[00:51:15.110] - Robert Moore
You know, the Zen people talk about how with the sage, there is no place for the horn of the rhinoceros to enter. And this is the type of thing they're talking about because with this person, with a masochistic sort of projection of the warrior, they got a hole, a sword shaped hole.

[00:51:40.510] - Robert Moore
Blinking and flashing.Place it here.

[00:51:45.410] - Speaker 2
There was a cartoon in Playboy where two deer were. One of them had a big birthmark of a target. They were saying, well, prep birthmark,

[00:51:58.130] - Robert Moore
birthmark of a target. Well, that's kind of so it's it's really important if if a person has no sense of their relatedness to this thing then there will often be some sort of unconscious invitation to abuse and they will go heck of a lot of it and it will be compulsive. There will be a compulsive expectation or a compulsive abusee or with domestic violence situation. Usually a cycle which oscillates back and forth from feeling of vulnerability to an abuse to a feeling of vulnerability to an abuse and so forth. That cycle is extremely common. What does one do? Well, you got to come to a conscious connection with this and there are only so many ways that one can come into a conscious connection and regulation of this. Now there are

[00:53:34.470] - Robert Moore
the individual cannot if you're possessed by if you're possessed by any archetype, you're not going to get out of it yourself because you are identified. You think you are it. I am it. One of the things that people a lot of pacifists intellectuals in France right before the war, second War, there were this big pacifist movement in France and anemia in the thirties they just thought all European intellectuals agreed with this.

[00:54:26.950] - Robert Moore
And so when they would go places and they would run into German elections because they would run into some German undergraduate who was at the University of Heidelberg and was in one of the dueling fraternities and was intent on being a Prussian knight and redressing the honor of the father. And they would be finding themselves in the presence of a warrior that wasn't going to talk any of this stuff that they had been celebrating in Cambridge and Oxford and places. I mean, it was really a shock for them to run into this once you run what they were running into was somebody was fired up with warrior energy and the line would be something like we're going to restore the honor of the father. And there would be a flushed sort of what we would call them sound a red neck, red neck. And it was a job for them. But you see, you're not going to that person is not when they're in that kind of martial energy and that kind of martial consciousness, they're not going to suddenly wake up and become a pacifist intellectual. They call that in Jungian psychology a constellation.

[00:56:09.570] - Robert Moore
This thing is constellated and it's got its own momentum then. And when you're in it, you're in it and something has to come in from the outside to challenge it or to contain it. The whole concept of containment comes in here because when you're dealing with this stuff you have to have some help in containing these energies because they will fry you if you don't have some help in insulating yourself from them. So one of the main things you try to work on with people is getting some capacity to be with these energies in context where they are somewhat contained and channeled. It is sublimation. This is what Freudians would call sublimation. Well you don't want to do with it what Freudians you don't want to be a Freudian about sublimation. This is what Freudians talk about. The problem with problem with a Freudian view of this sort of thing is that you get into this fantasy that if you really get analyzed that's what kind of happens. It's like the eclipse. You've seen the play. The idea that you get healed, you're not wonderful anymore. That's sort of a Freudian fantasy from a Jungian point of view.

[00:57:46.700] - Robert Moore
You never transform these archetypal patterns out of existence. You never transmute them and internalize them. They're never gone. They're always there. And the interesting thing about that is that once you realize that, then you know you're always vulnerable to possession by them there never will come a time when you will not be vulnerable to being possessed by and see if you're if you're a Freudian you think, well, now I've had my 20 year analysis and I am analyzed, and therefore, never again will I ever be grandiose. And so this means that by definition you will never find an arrogant Freudian analyst. I'm just telling you when you find an arrogant Jungian analyst, don't be surprised. Point is that we're all vulnerable to it all the time. Doesn't matter how much analysis you've had. However forewarned is forearmed. That's the idea that the ego has to have a sword when it comes to this. And you do your best on trying to get this thing. The image of the myth is you kill this being and chop it up and you make the world from the body of Tiamat. Well that's just an idea of developing an ego self axis and where you've got some sense about the way this huge being that is the archetypal psyche functions.

[00:59:19.250] - Robert Moore
What we're really trying to do in these classes is to help you chop up the dragon.

[00:59:26.000] - Speaker 2
This is aberrational psychology. This possession doesn't take place with normal people, just lunatics.

[00:59:31.830] - Robert Moore
Aberrational psychology?

[00:59:33.040] - Speaker 2
Yeah. This is not Jungianism from how you've presented it, this seems like a course in aberrational psychology. I mean people who overcome with this are lunatics. I mean they're not found. Well, hopefully no one in this class.

[00:59:47.950] - Robert Moore
Nobody in this class ever acts grandiose? It certainly can be. It certainly can be. And the point of it is that it's not precisely not just the lunatics. It's that this stuff is in everybody's wiring.

[01:00:21.590] - Robert Moore
Well and of course in a media society like ours which is more and more, I mean the kind of evocation of the archetypal is is really flooding. And it's a very interesting kind of evocation of the archetype. See one of the things you got to look at is what do you do in terms of accessing archetypal energy? How do you do it? Well, there are only just so many ways one does. Historically as humans you do it through various imaginative techniques and you can call them what you want to call them. You can call it advertising, but that is a technique of evoking archetypal potentials for one's ends. And somebody that's really good in marketing is about that.

[01:01:28.990] - Speaker 2
This was Ronald Reagan's gift.

[01:01:31.000] - Robert Moore
This was Reagan's gift. He was good at invoking these archetypal transfers. And that is the only way you can understand the way in which he was able to go out with a degree of popularity because he was able to evoke not so much ego, self axis in people, but he was able to evoke idealizing projections as king or whatever.

[01:02:02.570] - Robert Moore
Well, as warrior king, basically. Warrior certainly not the magus.

[01:02:12.010] - Speaker 2
What was that? Most native. I never understood how people got so seduced by that person,

[01:02:18.680] - Robert Moore
But he was more of the magus figure, sort of the sorcerer, sort of the whole kind of tricky bitch trickster is the immature magician.

[01:02:37.570] - Speaker 2
It was really the people around Reagan that were the magus.

[01:02:40.940] - Robert Moore
Yeah, well, let's get into Jungian techniques here. Well, what are the Jungian techniques for dealing with this? Well, the assumption is it's there. The assumption is it's in the wiring. And the assumption is you got a choice. You can avoid dealing with it consciously and just take your chances, or you can attempt to create a conscious relationship to this sector of the psyche. So what do you do? Well, of course, dream interpretation, right? So that's an obvious thing. And so in this context, you would watch for the warrior motifs in dreams. And most people have a good jedi in their dreams and they often manifest in shadow figures and you get these sadistic, violent, brutish shadow warriors and they're the ones that come in and beat everybody up or mercilessly sadistically, kill a bunch of people.

[01:03:58.910] - Robert Moore
That is a representation of the split off warrior energy. And so it's very important when you're using dream interpretation to look very carefully for the shadow representations of the warrior in dreams. And you need to get a sense if you're dreaming a lot of shadow warrior stuff, that means in your ego life, you're probably very passive aggressive. In other words, if it's coming up and you've got a lot of Nazi killers in your dreams, or if you are a Nazi killer in your dreams, you're getting better. When you're the Nazi killer in your dreams, you're getting better. And one of the things you'll notice the other thing, let's get to active imagination because when you have these figures come up in your dreams, you want to engage them, if possible, in active imagination. And personally, I think active imagination is the most important technique for working with this stuff because some of you could wait for years and not be able to have the dreams that work with this material. It may be so out of touch for you that you can never get to it through your dream work. I mean, if you're lucky and your dreams are real cooperative, you can work on this stuff through dream work, but a lot of you will never get to it with dream work.

[01:05:48.210] - Speaker 2
Yes, at one point you talked about managed between people that are possessed by the warrior and then the depression.

[01:05:58.050] - Robert Moore
Well, manic depressives is bipolar business. When you get in a manic phase, it can manifest in a warrior form, or it can manifest in any one of these other forms. You can have a lover inflation in a manic phase where you're out having sex with everybody, or you can be in the warrior manifestation in which you're out trying to intimidate and beat everybody up, going to bars and trying to get in a lot of fights. Or you can get into the King manic thing where you're strutting around waiting to be adored and holding audiences. It's not just the warriors, but you see what the Jungian point of view is very helpful compared to other points of view because when people get really crazyly grandiose, they don't get grandiose all over the place. Usually they get grandiose in specific ways. And when you get really possessed and grandiose in the lover archetype, you don't act the same way as you do when you get possessed and grandiose in the Warrior, or when you get possessed in grandiose in the King. Your behavior and your thinking and everything is very different. The good thing about the archetypal point of view is you'd be able to say, well, yeah, the person is manicky, but how is it coming out?

[01:07:23.540] - Robert Moore
What form is this manic, this inflation taking.

[01:07:28.670] - Speaker 2
Question I have? Is it how can it be safe for a person to access?

[01:07:42.130] - Robert Moore
Yeah, well, they're fairly illegal. It depends on your theory about mental health and psychiatry and blah, blah, blah. There are a great many people today who don't really believe that really sick people can get better. And that's basically because they don't want to mess with it. So you get somebody that's really crazy and you're faced with some decisions and they're meta theoretical decisions, decisions that are theory late, and also they're triage. They're based on triage. So they say, thank you. Man express a bipolar person or somebody schizophrenic, you ask the question, can they get better? Can they really get better? Well, the only way they could conceivably get better is develop ego structures. And of course, the first thing you're trying to do is you're trying to seal off the archetypal first. That's why you get all these borderlines I know I'm a Jungian well, how do I know I'm a Jungian? Well, I'm having all these archetypal dreams, right? They're all walking archetypes to help that person heal. They got to get away from some of that archetypal energy for a while, get some boundaries with it. Then you start trying to develop the capacity relate to it, because once you've ever known that energy, you're never going to give it up.

[01:09:29.030] - Robert Moore
You're never going to ever give it up. It's like it's what equisas is about. You don't want to give it up and of course the doctors want to medicate it out of existence. They end up with zombies. They end up with practically brain dead zombies after they treat them. So the point is simply right when they're real crazy you don't want them tiptoeing through the tulips with all these archetypes in a direct way. That's right. But the task for any kind of human to be healed is going to have to they're going to have to get a differentiation from themselves, and that does take a long time, a lot of effort, even with somebody that is sort of a normal Neurotic. Neurotics are so close to normal. It takes a long time working on trying to access it and not get overwhelmed by it. But it's like a muscle, it's like weight lifting. It's like you have a psychic the ego is like a muscle system and it has to be trained carefully and slowly like a muscle system because if it's not it rips or it just not capable of functioning as a sphincter. The ego functions like a sphincter and it has to function as a sphincter with this stuff.

[01:10:54.930] - Robert Moore
Okay so how to do it? Well dreams do your dreams if you gave you dream if you're lucky and you dream about this stuff then you work with your dreams and you kind of get readings on get readings on where you are with this kind of energy through the dreams. But then the treatment of choice is active imagination. Active imagination. You want to get Robert Johnson book called inner work. Inner work. Why don't we take about a five minute break and it would come back and I'll go into active imagination more and what to do with it.

[01:11:42.130] - Robert Moore
If you haven't been exposed to active imagination, it's really, in some ways, by far the most powerful technique in Jungian psychology for working with archetypal potentials. And these are techniques you can use to work with any archetypal structure, not just the warrior, but it has to do with what is known today so much widely as visualization techniques. Everybody is using visualization techniques now all of the Olympic, olympic athletes practice their events visualization techniques. It's a very big thing now Jung was one of the pioneers in working with this. What you should realize is that visualization techniques have been a part of a human ritual practice for centuries and centuries.

[01:12:46.630] - Robert Moore
What is known, what has been known as ritual magic is visualization technique. And so when you've got study all this stuff in the history of magic or you want to know what occultists do and always have done they have practiced visualization techniques in their mind to connect with various entities, metaphysical entities. In fact if you were to work with a local witch if you were to work with a local follower of the tradition of Alastair Crowley or any of those occultists you would be working with visualization techniques with various what they would consider to be entities. But what we Jungians we call archetypal potentials. The idea is that you visualize this particular archetypal image or a representation of it, and you dialogue with it. You engage it. Jung's point is not that you worship it in any dependent way or that you uncritically accept whatever this thing may say to you in a visualization, but that you engage it, that you talk with this figure and say you have had a manifestation of a figure in your dream. Say you have had a figure manifest in some shadow form in your dream. It's a very useful thing to get into a relaxed place where you cannot be disturbed, turn the phone off, use some relaxation techniques, breathing techniques to get yourself centered and down, and then visualize yourself going into a room where you have this person enter.

[01:14:55.950] - Robert Moore
And you engage this individual in a dialogue in which you ask them who they are, what they're doing, why they are so violent. Why are they manifesting in your dream? Where are they manifesting in your life? What role are they playing in your relationships? And you listen carefully to what this figure will say. One of the amazing things that you will find is you're not going to know what it's going to say, and it will often talk your ear off. I've gone around the country giving lectures on masculine psychology. And when I have a workshop, I always have an experiential component in which we do active imagination with these various archetypal figures. Usually I open it up so that whoever wants to come can come in the dialogue. And so it may be the king that comes in. It may be the magician, maybe the lover, so forth. But in this case, the good thing about active imagination is you can specifically invite the particular figure that you want to come, and you can engage them and you can interrogate them. If you've never done any active imagination, then you'll think to yourself, well, this is just a fraud.

[01:16:41.970] - Robert Moore
I'll be creating what is said. And that's always the case until somebody starts doing it and you start hearing them say all sorts of things that you didn't know and that you had never thought before, and they start coming up with insights and challenges that you could not have imagined before. And so that is one of the most powerful techniques to work with the warrior. But when you get home this evening, you can do this you visualize, create a space, invite the warrior in, see what he looks like, see how he's dressed, see how he presents himself. You may be a bit grossed out because especially if you're a nice person and you run into some SS colonel, but it's been my experience that a lot of very nice men have SS colonel warriors. And it's no accident that you got a lot of these little skinheads acting this out, sort of out there in the public. Well, all they're doing is just acting out what a bunch of very wimpy men are not able to connect with. And when the older men in the society integrate their warrior aspects of their psyche, there will be less pressure on teenagers to act this business out in aggressive ways.

[01:18:30.770] - Robert Moore
I think, just as in family therapy, we know that you get an identified patient who will act out whatever the parents are not actualized. The same thing is true in this warrior business. You get children and adolescents acting out these potentials for parents who are splitting them off and not dealing with them directly. So if you got a violent teenager, very often you've got a teenager who is in a situation where the adults are very much split off from this kind of potential.


The Warrior Within 07	[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
Yeah, well, let's get into Jungian techniques here. Well, what are the Jungian techniques for dealing with this? Well, the assumption is it's in the wiring. And the assumption is you got a choice. You can avoid dealing with it consciously and just take your chances, or you can attempt to create a conscious relationship to this sector of the psyche. So what do you do? Well, of course, dream interpretation, right? So that's an obvious thing. And so in this context, you would watch for the warrior motifs in dreams. And most people have a good jedi in their dreams and they often manifest in shadow figures and you get these sadistic, violent, brutish shadow warriors and they're the ones that come in and beat everybody up or mercilessly sadistically, kill a bunch of people.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
That is a representation of the split off warrior energy. And so it's very important when you're using dream interpretation to look very carefully for the shadow representations of the warrior in dreams. And you need to get a sense if you're dreaming a lot of shadow warrior stuff, that means in your ego life, you're probably very passive aggressive. In other words, if it's coming up and you've got a lot of Nazi killers in your dreams, or if you are a Nazi killer in your dreams, you're getting better. When you're the Nazi killer in your dreams, you're getting better. Because when you have these figures come up in your dreams, you want to engage them, if possible, in active imagination. And personally, I think active imagination is the most important technique for working with this stuff because some of you could wait for years and not be able to have the dreams that work with this material. It may be so out of touch for you that you can never get to it through your dream work. I mean, if you're lucky and your dreams are real cooperative, you can work on this stuff through dream work, but a lot of you will never get to it with dream work.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
Okay so how to do it? Well if you're lucky and you dream about this stuff then you work with your dreams and you kind of get readings on where you are with this kind of energy through the dreams. But then the treatment of choice is active imagination. Active imagination. You want to get Robert Johnson’s book called inner work. Inner work.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
If you haven't been exposed to active imagination, it's in some ways, by far the most powerful technique in Jungian psychology for working with archetypal potentials. And these are techniques you can use to work with any archetypal structure, not just the warrior, but it has to do with what is known today widely as visualization techniques. Everybody is using visualization techniques now. all of the olympic athletes practice their events with visualization techniques. It's a very big thing and Jung was one of the pioneers in working with this. What you should realize is that visualization techniques have been a part of a human ritual practice for centuries and centuries.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
What is known, what has been known as ritual magic is visualization technique. You've got study all this stuff, the history of magic if you want to know what occultists do and always have done. they have practiced visualization techniques in their mind to connect with various entities, metaphysical entities. In fact if you were to work with a local witch if you were to work with a local follower of the tradition of Alastair Crowley or any of those occultists you would be working with visualization techniques with what they would consider to be entities. But what we Jungians call archetypal potentials. The idea is that you visualize this particular archetypal image or a representation of it, and you dialogue with it. You engage it. Jung's point is not that you worship it in any dependent way or that you uncritically accept whatever this thing may say to you in a visualization, but that you engage it, that you talk with this figure and say you have had a manifestation of a figure in your dream. Say you have had a figure manifest in some shadow form in your dream. It's a very useful thing to get into a relaxed place where you cannot be disturbed, turn the phone off, use some relaxation techniques, breathing techniques to get yourself centered and down, and then visualize yourself going into a room where you have this person enter.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
And you engage this individual in a dialogue in which you ask them who they are, what they're doing, why they are so violent. Why are they manifesting in your dream? Where are they manifesting in your life? What role are they playing in your relationships? And you listen carefully to what this figure will say. One of the amazing things that you will find is you're not going to know what it's going to say, and it will often talk your ear off. I've gone around the country giving lectures on masculine psychology. And when I have a workshop, I always have an experiential component in which we do active imagination with these various archetypal figures. Usually I open it up so that whoever wants to come can come in the dialogue. And so it may be the king that comes in. It may be the magician, maybe the lover, so forth. But in this case, the good thing about active imagination is you can specifically invite the particular figure that you want to come, and you can engage them and you can interrogate them. If you've never done any active imagination, then you'll think to yourself, well, this is just a fraud.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
I'll be creating what is said. And that's always the case until somebody starts doing it and you start hearing them say all sorts of things that you didn't know and that you had never thought before, and they start coming up with insights and challenges that you could not have imagined before. And so that is one of the most powerful techniques to work with the warrior. But, you can do this you visualize, create a space, invite the warrior in, see what he looks like, see how he's dressed, see how he presents himself. You may be a bit grossed out because especially if you're a nice person and you run into some SS colonel, but it's been my experience that a lot of very nice men have SS colonel warriors. And it's no accident that you got a lot of these little skinheads acting this out, sort of out there in the public. Well, all they're doing is just acting out what a bunch of very wimpy men are not able to connect with. And when the older men in the society integrate their warrior aspects of their psyche, there will be less pressure on teenagers to act this business out in aggressive ways.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
I think, just as in family therapy, we know that you get an identified patient who will act out whatever the parents are not actualized. The same thing is true in this warrior business. You get children and adolescents acting out these potentials for parents who are splitting them off and not dealing with them directly. So if you got a violent teenager, very often you've got a teenager who is in a situation where the adults are very much split off from this kind of potential.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
So that's a very important technique for use in connecting with this thing in your psyche. And it's good to key off of your dreams. If you're dreaming and you're getting these figures, it's good to key off of that and let the psyche present to you the images that you will go into and try to engage in dialogue.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
And if you can get that SS Colonel conscious and you got him where you can talk to him and you can engage him, then there will be, by definition, increase in ego strength because you will not necessarily be having him run around acting out without your knowledge. So, in other words, when you get this SS Colonel, he hasn't been created by the active imagination. You've been acting out this sadistic side in ways you're unaware of. So you ask him, how have you been manifesting yourself in my life?

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
He will most likely tell you and he will most likely nail you on the ways you have been sadistic in your relationships or at work, or in other ways and confront you. I've never seen anybody more confronting than these figures in active imaginations. I've conducted entire analyses in which I didn't do any interpreting, but these figures did the interpreting and often they were more confronting than I would think. But when it's your own inner figures that are confronting you, you tend to listen better than me. If I'm confronting you about your being sadistic, you will argue with me, oh, no, I'm not, I'm really a nice guy.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore


[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore
But if this inner figure comes to you and says, yes, I'm your sadistic side, and you say, oh, I don't understand that, I'm never sadistic. And then he tells you the ways in which you're sadistic and you know it's true, then it's awful hard to defend against it. That’s a wonderful thing about active imagination. Your defenses are down and this thing can talk to you and tell you the truth that your therapist would never be able to get away with telling you. That's the good thing about it.

[00:38:13.910] - Robert Moore







